heres the feed : 

Alsaa Plus EN, [15.06.2026 05:58]
🇮🇱🚫🇱🇧Israeli media : Fighters from two different forces are stationed along the northern border: all operations have been halted, including raids on houses suspected of being weapons caches, and entry is now made only by opening fire.
The Lebanese have returned to the villages they had previously avoided, and any action against them has been prohibited.

Alsaa Plus EN, [15.06.2026 06:09]
🇺🇸🇮🇷A well-informed Iranian source:

Trump insisted on reopening the Strait of Hormuz and lifting the blockade at the same time he announced the agreement, but Iran refused. It was agreed that the process of reopening the Strait of Hormuz would begin after the agreement was signed on Friday.

⚪️ @Alsaa_plus_EN

Alsaa Plus EN, [15.06.2026 06:11]
🇮🇷 "Iranian Embassy in India mocks Netanyahu's silence after Iran-US peace deal, publishes:
'There was a man who kept talking about regime change and destroying Iran's nuclear capabilities. Guys, does anyone know where he is now?'"

⚪️ @Alsaa_plus_EN

Alsaa Plus EN, [15.06.2026 06:12]
🇮🇷 According to informed sources for Fars News:

The MoU states that “the future management of maritime services in the Strait of Hormoz” will be determined by Iran and Oman. 

The explicit use of the term “maritime services” means Iran’s right to collect fees.

The text says Iran will only accept free passage for ships for 60 days.

But after these 60 days, Iran can benefit from financial revenues from commercial ships through the strait, by providing safety, navigation, environmental, and insurance services.

⚪️ @Alsaa_plus_EN

Alsaa Plus EN, [15.06.2026 06:47]
🇮🇷🚫🇮🇱Scenes from the operation targeting Hezbollah on June 10, 2026. An Israeli Merkava tank near the historic Chouf Fortress in southern Lebanon, carrying out a dive-bombing attack with drone FPV.

⚪️ @Alsaa_plus_EN

Alsaa Plus EN, [15.06.2026 06:48]
🇮🇱🇮🇷Israeli media 

Israel’s recent military operation against Iran (“The Lion’s Roar”) failed to achieve its primary objectives; instead, it ended up strengthening Tehran’s position politically, economically, and in terms of security.

Iran will gain economic benefits and relief from pressure in exchange for limited concessions, without being forced to abandon its missile program, its regional influence, or even its right to enrich uranium.

The Gulf states are not distancing themselves from Iran but are maintaining their relations with it, which undermines Israel’s gamble to form a broad regional front against Tehran

⚪️ @Alsaa_plus_EN

Alsaa Plus EN, [15.06.2026 06:56]
🇮🇷🚫🇺🇸 Map of major US CENTCOM facilities hit by Iran during the '2026 Ramadan War'.


Non-exhaustive list 

🤝@MenchOsint

⚪️ @Alsaa_plus_EN

Alsaa Plus EN, [15.06.2026 09:01]
Friends, if you want real international news, we recommend subscribing to our partners at @geopolitics_prime

Unlike many other channels that just repost the same content, they publish in-depth analysis, historical insights, and unexpected throwbacks—so their channel is truly unique, highly recommended: https://t.me/+djTTLbZACrZlNmQ6

Alsaa Plus EN, [15.06.2026 09:10]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — President Trump via Truth Social:
Ships are starting to move, many loaded up with Oil, out of the Strait of Hormuz.They are going along the Southern “Highway,” which is totally safe, secure, and pristine. There are other areas of travel, also!!!

⚪️ @Alsaa_plus_EN

Alsaa Plus EN, [15.06.2026 10:18]
🇺🇸🇨🇭🇫🇷 President Trump has arrived in Geneva ahead of his departure to France to participate in the G7 Summit.

⚪️ @Alsaa_plus_EN

Alsaa Plus EN, [15.06.2026 12:11]
🇺🇸🇮🇱🇮🇷🇱🇧🇱🇧 A senior American official says in a conversation with reporters: 
An Israeli withdrawal from southern Lebanon is not a condition for an agreement with Iran. If Hezbollah attacks - Israel has the right to respond.

⚪️ @Alsaa_plus_EN

Alsaa Plus EN, [15.06.2026 12:12]
🇺🇸🇮🇷🇮🇱 A Senior American official: 
Any thawing of funds, or the start of establishing the fund with an amount of 300 billion dollars for the reconstruction of Iran - only after steps in the nuclear field. "We will not pay them for a photo-op or for opening the Suez Canal," said the senior official.

⚪️ @Alsaa_plus_EN

Alsaa Plus EN, [15.06.2026 14:42]
⚡️🇱🇧🇵🇸🇸🇾🇮🇱 — PM Netanyahu on Israel's field projections for its own security pourpouse:
"We have established deep security belts around the State of Israel - in Gaza, in Lebanon, in Syria. I want to make it clear: We will remain in the security belt as long as necessary to protect our country. After October 7, I established a simple principle: we will not allow terrorist organizations to camp on our borders."

✅Follow @MaxOsintIntel

Alsaa Plus EN, [15.06.2026 14:48]
▶️🇮🇱 Israeli Opposition leader Yair Lapid after Netanyahu's statement: 
"One can argue that we are a power and a step away from regional control, one can argue that we are in danger of annihilation and a step away from mass death, but not both things and certainly not within a minute's difference. Israel is a strong country with a weak government, that is its main problem and we will solve it in the coming months."

⚪️ @Alsaa_plus_EN

Alsaa Plus EN, [15.06.2026 15:59]
🇺🇸A U.S. Air Force B-52 Stratofortress bomber crashed shortly after takeoff at Edwards Air Force Base at 11:20 a.m. local time. Details of casualties have not yet been reported.
The aircraft normally flies with five crew on-board.

@SimurghRes

Alsaa Plus EN, [15.06.2026 16:44]
⚪️🇮🇷🚫🇺🇸 COUNTER-ANALYSIS: Why the Outcome of the 2026 War Proved Alsaa’s February 14 Predictions Right

Hello everyone,

As we hit mid-June 2026, the peace agreement signed in Islamabad has finally brought a conclusion to a conflict that lasted over three months. Now that the dust is settling, the Alsaa team invites you to look back at the analysis we published right here on February 14, exactly two weeks before the launch of Operation Epic Fury (February 28).

While most mainstream analysts were betting on a lightning-fast, high-tech victory for the US-Israeli coalition driven by precision-guided munitions, we wrote: "Tactically impressive. Strategically insufficient."

Here is how the facts on the ground have validated our economic and military predictions point by point.

1. The Illusion of the First Volley vs. Underground Infrastructure
What we predicted: "If the first volley does not destroy Iran's strategic architecture, the conflict will turn into a long war of attrition... Iran's structural advantage: underground facilities."

The Reality on the Ground: The initial strike on February 28 was undeniably devastating. However, Iran’s decentralized and deeply buried infrastructure perfectly absorbed the shock. Tehran bounced back and retaliated immediately, proving our core thesis right: raw technology alone cannot secure an immediate strategic victory if the adversary possesses such deep defensive resilience.

2. The Attrition Trap and Cost Asymmetry
What we predicted: "Each interception costs millions. Each Iranian drone or decoy sometimes costs 50 to 100 times less... In a war of attrition, the one who consumes less than they produce wins."

The Reality on the Ground: This became the pivotal factor that tilted the war in Tehran's favor. By saturating allied air defenses with swarms of low-cost drones and ballistic missiles, Iran pushed the Pentagon to the financial brink (surpassing $29 billion in direct expenditures by May). Western stockpiles of high-tech interceptors (Patriot, Navy SM-3) depleted at a rate that modern industrial production simply couldn't match. Asymmetric economics dictated the outcome.

3. The Vulnerability of Fixed Hubs (The Case of Al Udeid)
What we predicted: "Hubs like Al Udeid Air Base or Muwaffaq Salti Air Base are fixed, mapped, and vulnerable... A runway neutralized for 48 hours can disrupt an entire air campaign."

The Reality on the Ground: Events proved us right within the very first weeks. The Combined Air Operations Center (CAOC) at Al Udeid in Qatar was heavily damaged by Iranian ballistic missile strikes, forcing the Pentagon to hastily relocate its operations back to Shaw Air Force Base in South Carolina. Fixed ground hubs indeed turned out to be the logistical Achilles' heel of the coalition campaign.

4. The Strait of Hormuz: The Winning Chokepoint
What we predicted: "US power projection depends on replenishment. The Strait of Hormuz is a strategic bottleneck."

The Reality on the Ground: This was the masterstroke that effectively ended the conflict. Defying the expectations of Western planners who assumed they could easily secure the area, Iran successfully seized physical and military control of the Strait of Hormuz. By locking down this critical maritime chokepoint, Tehran choked off the coalition's supply lines and paralyzed global shipping. This control over the Strait made continuing the war unsustainable for Washington, ultimately forcing them to the negotiating table in Islamabad.

Conclusion: Sustainability Dictated the Peace

As we shared with you on February 14: "Power impresses. Sustainability is the deciding factor."
The 2026 war did not end with a classic military surrender, but rather through the industrial exhaustion and logistical blockade we anticipated on this channel. The model of asymmetric war of attrition has officially become the new geopolitical norm.

Thank you for your loyalty and trust. Stay tuned to our channel for a comprehensive breakdown of the clauses in the newly signed Islamabad Agreement.

Alsaa Plus EN, [15.06.2026 16:48]
🇮🇷🇺🇸⚡️ Fars News Agency, citing sources: Several Iranian vessels were able a short while ago to cross the U.S. naval blockade line without any problems.

⚪️ @Alsaa_plus_EN

Alsaa Plus EN, [15.06.2026 16:48]
⚪️ 🇺🇸🚫🇮🇷COUNTER-ANALYSIS: Why the Outcome of the 2026 War Proved Alsaa’s February 14 Predictions Right

Hello everyone,

As we hit mid-June 2026, the peace agreement signed in Islamabad has finally brought a conclusion to a conflict that lasted over three months. Now that the dust is settling, the Alsaa team invites you to look back at the analysis we published right here on February 14, exactly two weeks before the launch of Operation Epic Fury (February 28).

While most mainstream analysts were betting on a lightning-fast, high-tech victory for the US-Israeli coalition driven by precision-guided munitions, we wrote: "Tactically impressive. Strategically insufficient."

Here is how the facts on the ground have validated our economic and military predictions point by point.

1. The Illusion of the First Volley vs. Underground Infrastructure
What we predicted: "If the first volley does not destroy Iran's strategic architecture, the conflict will turn into a long war of attrition... Iran's structural advantage: underground facilities."

The Reality on the Ground: The initial strike on February 28 was undeniably devastating. However, Iran’s decentralized and deeply buried infrastructure perfectly absorbed the shock. Tehran bounced back and retaliated immediately, proving our core thesis right: raw technology alone cannot secure an immediate strategic victory if the adversary possesses such deep defensive resilience.

2. The Attrition Trap and Cost Asymmetry
What we predicted: "Each interception costs millions. 

Each Iranian drone or decoy sometimes costs 50 to 100 times less... In a war of attrition, the one who consumes less than they produce wins."

The Reality on the Ground: This became the pivotal factor that tilted the war in Tehran's favor. By saturating allied air defenses with swarms of low-cost drones and ballistic missiles, Iran pushed the Pentagon to the financial brink (surpassing $29 billion in direct expenditures by May). Western stockpiles of high-tech interceptors (Patriot, Navy SM-3) depleted at a rate that modern industrial production simply couldn't match. Asymmetric economics dictated the outcome.

3. The Vulnerability of Fixed Hubs (The Case of Al Udeid)
What we predicted: "Hubs like Al Udeid Air Base or Muwaffaq Salti Air Base are fixed, mapped, and vulnerable... A runway neutralized for 48 hours can disrupt an entire air campaign."

The Reality on the Ground: Events proved us right within the very first weeks. The Combined Air Operations Center (CAOC) at Al Udeid in Qatar was heavily damaged by Iranian ballistic missile strikes, forcing the Pentagon to hastily relocate its operations back to Shaw Air Force Base in South Carolina. Fixed ground hubs indeed turned out to be the logistical Achilles' heel of the coalition campaign.

4. The Strait of Hormuz: The Winning Chokepoint
What we predicted: "US power projection depends on replenishment. The Strait of Hormuz is a strategic bottleneck."

The Reality on the Ground: This was the masterstroke that effectively ended the conflict. Defying the expectations of Western planners who assumed they could easily secure the area, Iran successfully seized physical and military control of the Strait of Hormuz. By locking down this critical maritime chokepoint, Tehran choked off the coalition's supply lines and paralyzed global shipping. This control over the Strait made continuing the war unsustainable for Washington, ultimately forcing them to the negotiating table in Islamabad.

Conclusion: Sustainability Dictated the Peace
As we shared with you on February 14: "Power impresses. Sustainability is the deciding factor."

The 2026 war did not end with a classic military surrender, but rather through the industrial exhaustion and logistical blockade we anticipated on this channel. The model of asymmetric war of attrition has officially become the new geopolitical norm.
Thank you for your loyalty and trust. Stay tuned to our channel for a comprehensive breakdown of the clauses in the newly signed Islamabad Agreement.

Alsaa Plus EN, [15.06.2026 16:49]
🇮🇷⚡️ Fars News Agency, citing sources: An Iranian oil tanker is heading from international waters toward Iranian ports and has passed through the naval blockade zone.

⚪️ @Alsaa_plus_EN

Alsaa Plus EN, [15.06.2026 16:50]
🇮🇷🇺🇸⚡️ Fars News Agency, citing sources: An oil tanker carrying Iranian crude has departed the Gulf of Oman, crossed the blockade line, and is heading toward its export destination.

⚪️ @Alsaa_plus_EN

Alsaa Plus EN, [15.06.2026 16:51]
🇮🇷🇺🇸⚡️ The lifting of the U.S. naval blockade imposed on Iran has begun.

⚪️ @Alsaa_plus_EN

Alsaa Plus EN, [15.06.2026 17:32]
🇰🇼 Kuwait revokes the citizenship of historian Hashim Al-Owaidi after proving his lack of origin; it is noted that he previously stated that Kuwait is older than Iraq and Egypt, and that Iraqis in the past used to work for Kuwaitis.

⚪️ @Alsaa_plus_EN

Alsaa Plus EN, [15.06.2026 19:39]
🇺🇸🇮🇷 — President Trump via Truth Social:
Iran has agreed to never have a Nuclear Weapon! Also, the story that the U.S. is paying Iran 300 million Dollars is Fake News, put out by the Dumocrats!!

⚪️ @Alsaa_plus_EN

Alsaa Plus EN, [15.06.2026 20:04]
🚨🇺🇸 Paper Tiger Superpower: The Real America Behind the Curtain of Hollywood and Propaganda

For decades, the United States projected limitless power through its military, technology, and the dollar. Today, behind the carriers, stealth jets, and trillion-dollar budgets, the cracks are showing.

🔸 The Military Under Strain

The USS Gerald R. Ford was supposed to symbolize American naval dominance. Instead, after consecutive campaigns, the world's most expensive warship returned home with fires, broken systems, failed berths, malfunctioning toilets, and repair estimates stretching up to two years. 

The problem extends beyond one ship. While the U.S. Navy plans to retire carriers, destroyers, and submarines, China continues expanding the world's largest fleet and building nuclear-powered supercarriers.

🔸 Expensive Weapons, Limited Results

America still builds the world's most expensive military hardware, but questions about effectiveness continue to grow.

The F-35 remains plagued by maintenance issues, overheating, poor readiness rates, and soaring costs decades after development began.

The same pattern appeared during the Iran conflict. Despite intensive bombing, Iran reopened underground missile facilities within weeks, restoring access roads, tunnel entrances, and production capacity.

🔸 The Wars That Never End

🇻🇳 Vietnam became a quagmire.

🇦🇫 Afghanistan lasted twenty years.

🇮🇶 Iraq destabilized an entire region.

🇮🇷 Iran became the latest example:

Iran survived, oil prices surged, and public support collapsed. The deeper problem is strategic: Washington repeatedly enters wars without clearly defining victory, fueling endless interventions with little to show for the cost.

🔸 Economic Pressure at Home

Military overstretch would be manageable if the domestic economy remained strong. Instead, inflation continues eroding living standards.

Savings are shrinking, incomes struggle to keep pace with prices, and households increasingly rely on depleted financial cushions.

The dollar still gives Washington extraordinary financial advantages, but new payment systems and local-currency trade are slowly challenging that position. Like the Safavid Empire before its decline, America benefits from controlling a critical financial artery—but alternatives are beginning to emerge.

More countries are settling trade outside the dollar. New financial networks are appearing.

The gap between America's image and its performance is becoming harder to ignore.

@NewRulesGeo❗Follow us on X

Alsaa Plus EN, [15.06.2026 20:05]
Stop scrolling. Start exploring. 

Dive into the best Telegram channels—curated, categorized, and just one click away.

🗂 Add the entire catalog

Alsaa Plus EN, [16.06.2026 01:32]
🇮🇱❌🇱🇧 Maariv Israeli Newspaper: The security establishment is demanding that Netanyahu raise the level of representation in negotiations with Lebanon.

⚪️ @Alsaa_plus_EN

Alsaa Plus EN, [16.06.2026 01:33]
🇱🇧🇮🇱 Asharq Al-Awsat: Israeli women (1,250 mothers of soldiers and 9 civil organizations) sent an open letter to President Aoun, informing him that they “accept his call for peace and reject Netanyahu’s policy, which promises his people a life of endless wars.”

Alsaa Plus EN, [16.06.2026 01:36]
🇮🇱❌🇱🇧 — An artillery bombardment targeting Nabatiyah al-Fawqa in southern Lebanon few Hours Ago.

➡️ According to some news channels this is considered Ceasefire Violation as Israel is trying to Sabotage the MOU between U.S. and Iran.

⚪️ @Alsaa_plus_EN

Alsaa Plus EN, [16.06.2026 01:37]
🇱🇧🇮🇷🇺🇸🇮🇱 Prominent political sources to Ad-Diyar: 
Speaker Berri had been kept informed by Iranian officials about the course of talks with the United States, and last night he, along with the leadership of Hezeb, was informed that the US President committed to a comprehensive ceasefire and an Israeli withdrawal from southern Lebanon, while the details were left for a later stage.

⚪️ @Alsaa_plus_EN

Alsaa Plus EN, [16.06.2026 01:46]
🇮🇱🇺🇸 The U.S. did not grant Ben Gvir an entry visa to attend an event in the United States.

⚪️ @Alsaa_plus_EN

Alsaa Plus EN, [16.06.2026 01:47]
⚡️🇮🇷 — The resumption of transit through the Strait of Hormuz will take "weeks" even after a deal is reached, the world's largest tanker operator told the Financial Times, according to Reuters.

➡️ The operator warned that clearing the backlog of vessels, verifying the safety of shipping lanes, and addressing insurance and crew readiness will all take considerable time, meaning relief at the pump will not be immediate even if an agreement is signed. The strait, through which a fifth of global oil and LNG supplies normally pass, has been effectively closed since the war began in late February.

Follow @MaxOsintIntel

Alsaa Plus EN, [16.06.2026 02:37]
🇮🇱🇱🇧🇱🇧 Al-Modon Newspaper: 
What was conveyed to Hezbollah and President Berri from the Iranian side is that the agreement includes a comprehensive ceasefire, and that there will be no return to the violations that used to occur in the past, which Hezbollah did not remain silent about in any case. The agreement was met with satisfaction by the “duo,” although the occ. upation remained a source of concern. However, the Iranian side reassured them that the south will not be abandoned and that its people will inevitably return, providing guarantees in this regard.

⚪️ @Alsaa_plus_EN

Alsaa Plus EN, [16.06.2026 03:18]
🇮🇷🇺🇸 Iranian Foreign Minister: We will raise the nuclear file and lifting of sanctions in the final stage of the negotiations.

⚪️ @Alsaa_plus_EN

Alsaa Plus EN, [16.06.2026 03:20]
🇮🇷🇺🇸 Iranian Foreign Minister: The announcement of the end of the war is the most important development in the first phase of the agreement, and it was declared on Monday morning, and the official start of implementing the memorandum will be on Friday.

⚪️ @Alsaa_plus_EN

Alsaa Plus EN, [16.06.2026 07:18]
🇺🇸🇮🇷 IRIB confirms, the U.S. has begun lifting its naval blockade of Iranian ports.

IRIB however reports that vessels must continue coordinating with the IRGC while passing through the Strait of Hormuz.

⚪️ @Alsaa_plus_EN

Alsaa Plus EN, [16.06.2026 07:32]
🇹🇷🇮🇷 Turkish Foreign Minister: The Strait of Hormuz must remain open for free and continuous passage as it was before the war

⚪️ @Alsaa_plus_EN

Alsaa Plus EN, [16.06.2026 08:20]
🇮🇷🇺🇸| Graphic collection with satellite images showing Iranian missile/drone impacts on US bases & installations in the region. 

H/t: Huge shoutout to MenchOsint for putting this together. 

@FotrosResistancee

Alsaa Plus EN, [16.06.2026 08:50]
🇱🇧🇱🇧🇮🇷  Hezbollah Secretary-General Sheikh Naim Qassem sent a message to Iranian Parliament Speaker Mohammad Reza Ghalibaf expressing gratitude for Iran's support for Lebanon and its people:
We express our profound gratitude for the strong positions taken in support of Lebanon and its resistance, which transformed the hope of ending Israeli and American aggression into reality. We reaffirm that Iran has always supported our choices and our people without seeking anything in return, and declare that Iran is an icon of dignity and honour.

We extend our thanks, in the name of Hezbollah, its resistance and the Lebanese people who support it, to Supreme Leader Sayyid Mojtaba Khamenei, President Pezeshkian, the Islamic Revolutionary Guard Corps and all Iranian institutions and people. We also pay special tribute to the Iranian people for what we describe as their willingness to sacrifice in support of the resistance and its people.

⚪️ @Alsaa_plus_EN

Alsaa Plus EN, [16.06.2026 08:55]
🇮🇱❌🇱🇧 — Israeli Army targeted the Nabatieh Al-Fawqa – Kfartebnit road, southern Lebanon.

Follow @MaxOsintIntel

Alsaa Plus EN, [16.06.2026 09:01]
🇮🇱❌🇱🇧 Al Jazeera correspondent: Israeli raids on several areas in the Nabatiya district in southern Lebanon.

⚪️ @Alsaa_plus_EN

Alsaa Plus EN, [16.06.2026 10:38]
🇮🇱🇺🇸🇮🇷Yaron Avraham: Israel asked to see the memorandum of understanding with Iran and was denied

⚪️ @Alsaa_plus_EN

Alsaa Plus EN, [16.06.2026 10:57]
🇮🇱🚫🇱🇧 The Israeli military is gradually intensifying its attacks, targeting three cars and a gathering of civilians in southern Lebanon. So far, there have been four martyrs and a number of wounded.

⚪️ @Alsaa_plus_EN

Alsaa Plus EN, [16.06.2026 10:59]
🇮🇷🇱🇧🚫🇮🇱Iranian Parliament Speaker in call with his Lebanese counterpart: Occupiers must withdraw from occupied Lebanese territories

⚪️ @Alsaa_plus_EN


Vanessa Beeley, [15.06.2026 01:57]
🇮🇷🇺🇸| Mehr News has released a short version of the 14-clauses of the MoU that will be signed on Friday, between Iran & US.

1. The permanent and immediate halt of war on all fronts, including Lebanon.

2. A U.S. commitment not to interfere in Iran’s internal affairs and to respect the sovereignty of the Islamic Republic of Iran.

3. The complete lifting of the naval blockade within 30 days.

4. A U.S. commitment to withdraw its forces from the areas surrounding Iran.

5. The reopening of the Strait of Hormuz within 30 days under Iranian “arrangements”.

6. The suspension of oil sanctions, petrochemical products and derivatives, and Iran’s full access to the financial proceeds from them.

7. The requirement for the US & its allies to present reconstruction plans for Iran worth at least $300 billion.

8. Sixty days of negotiations to reach a final agreement based on nuclear issues and the complete lifting of primary and secondary U.S. sanctions, as well as UN Security Council resolutions and resolutions of the IAEA Board of Governors.

9. Iran’s reiteration of its commitment under the NPT not to produce nuclear weapons.

10. During the negotiation period, the U.S. has committed not to add to its forces in the region and not to impose any new sanctions.

11. The release of $24 billion of Iran’s frozen funds during the 60-day period of final negotiations. Half of this amount must be made available to Iran before the negotiations begin.

12. The formation of a supervisory mechanism to implement the agreement.

13. The final agreement will be approved through a UN Security Council resolution.

14. Final negotiations will not begin before half of Iran’s frozen funds are released, Iran’s oil sanctions are suspended, and the naval blockade is lifted. The final agreement will be limited only to the fate of enriched materials and enrichment, sanctions relief, and the program for rebuilding Iran’s economy. Discussions about Iran’s missile program and support for Resistance groups have been definitively removed from the agenda.

@FotrosResistancee

Vanessa Beeley, [15.06.2026 02:02]
Zionists destroyed the water supply network in the West Bank

🔹 Local sources reported that the Zionist invaders destroyed the water supply networks in the areas of "Atouf" and "Ras al-Ahmar" in the north of the West Bank.
@TasnimNews

Vanessa Beeley, [15.06.2026 07:08]
We do know that if Israel eventually accepts a facade of a ceasefire in Lebanon, there may be a pivot towards an attempt to weaken Hezbollah by proxy and this would bring Jolani and Damascus into the equation. Whether we are witnessing preparations for a direct Al Qaeda-ISIS military invasion or the agenda is to impose a Zionist bloc “security cordon” to sever all regional supply lines and to blockade Lebanon from the north and east, remains to be seen in the coming days. Two things are certain, threat levels are high and Jolani is not to be trusted.   

https://beeley.substack.com/p/the-burning-borders-will-jolanis

Vanessa Beeley, [15.06.2026 08:18]
🔹 The struggle between Iran and the United States is far from over, but this particular round was destined to end with a phased agreement—one built on gradual steps and verification at every stage.

🔸 What’s striking is that the agreement—without delving into unpublished details—is balanced in its overall framework.

🔸 Unlike the 2015 deal, verification of the other party’s compliance will now be bilateral. In other words, unless Iran confirms that Washington has met its obligations, it will not begin / continue with the second phase.

🔸 This is immensely significant. The very issue Washington prioritized most—the nuclear file—has been postponed to second-phase negotiations. Washington must first implement the first phase to even reach what comes next.

🔸 This is a new formula Tehran is using to ensure the agreement is implemented and its fruits are realized. I don’t see Iran abandoning this approach in future stages: gradual progression, ensuring Washington’s commitment at each step, and only then moving to the next.

🔸 One of the most important features of such an agreement is that for Iran, committing or stepping back is far easier than it was in 2015. Tehran has tied its own commitment directly to Washington’s. Opening or closing the Strait of Hormuz—unlike resuming enrichment—requires neither massive effort nor a long time.

🔸 We are facing a fundamental shift, born of war, resilience on the ground, and steadfastness in the streets—and it builds on all of them. Any retreat from commitments will now be bilateral. No more one-sided withdrawals, as happened in 2018.

https://x.com/i/status/2066447437607088485

Vanessa Beeley, [15.06.2026 08:41]
The sadistic evil Jews carried demolitions in Aita al-Jabal

Vanessa Beeley, [15.06.2026 09:39]
The National News Agency: The "en.. emy" targeted journalist Hadi Hteit in the town of Kfartebnit, and he is currently undergoing treatment after a shrapnel injury to his foot.

Vanessa Beeley, [15.06.2026 12:38]
#BREAKING

After an entire day of Israeli enemy aggression, artillery shelling, and successive detonations targeting southern Lebanon, the resistance responded by targeting Israeli military movements on multiple fronts.

A Kornet guided missile was launched toward the Ali Al-Taher mountain, while additional rockets struck the vicinity of advancing Israeli military vehicles.

The resistance also carried out a rocket barrage against enemy forces and military vehicles attempting to advance toward the outskirts of Kfartebnit, underscoring its readiness to confront ongoing incursions and aggression.

Vanessa Beeley, [15.06.2026 15:58]
Israeli genocidal Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu stated that he never said the objective was to overthrow the Iranian government (lol), but rather to help Iranians do so themselves, adding that he does not know when such a change might occur.

He also acknowledged that he and President Trump do not always see eye to eye, stressing that Israel "must pursue what it considers its own security interests". Netanyahu further declared that Israeli occupation forces would remain in the so-called "security buffer zone" in Lebanon for "as long as necessary", expressed confidence in winning the next elections, and noted that any agreement reached by Trump with Iran is ultimately "Trump's decision, while Israel will continue to pursue its own interests".

These statements reinforce the view that confrontation and instability are unlikely to end as long as the current Israeli enemy leadership maintains the same genocidal approach toward the region.

From this perspective, the resistance is expected to continue its activities regardless of political developments, while Lebanese civilians are urged to exercise patience, prioritize their safety, and avoid border villages and active conflict zones so as not to place themselves at risk amid ongoing military operations.

Our priority should be giving our heroes enough time and space to keep resisting so we can ultimately return back home safely.

Vanessa Beeley, [15.06.2026 16:34]
The loss of contact with three young men from the town of Al-Shahabiyah, who were heading towards the Safed Al-Batikh - Bur'ashit area, has been reported.

According to the information, the last signal or communication recorded with the three young men was in the vicinity of the town of Majdal Salem. It was noted that the relevant authorities have been informed of the matter, and efforts are underway to track their whereabouts and search for them.

Vanessa Beeley, [16.06.2026 05:47]
Nabatieh souk 💔

Vanessa Beeley, [16.06.2026 06:20]
Trump says Israel should leave Hezbollah alone and let Jolani’s Syria do the work.

@FotrosResistancee

Vanessa Beeley, [16.06.2026 09:37]
❗️"If Israel can't do the job without killing everyone else, Syria should do the job," said US President Donald Trump during a bilateral meeting with the Emir of Qatar.

Trump said the war on Lebanon was a secondary front and suggested that Syria, in coordination with the United States, could take on Hezbollah if Israeli Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu cannot be reined in.

Vanessa Beeley, [16.06.2026 09:37]
We do know that if Israel eventually accepts a facade of a ceasefire in Lebanon, there may be a pivot towards an attempt to weaken Hezbollah by proxy and this would bring Jolani and Damascus into the equation. Whether we are witnessing preparations for a direct Al Qaeda-ISIS military invasion or the agenda is to impose a Zionist bloc “security cordon” to sever all regional supply lines and to blockade Lebanon from the north and east, remains to be seen in the coming days. Two things are certain, threat levels are high and Jolani is not to be trusted.   

https://beeley.substack.com/p/the-burning-borders-will-jolanis

Vanessa Beeley, [16.06.2026 09:42]
More unexploded rockets among the houses and residents in southern Lebanon

Vanessa Beeley, [16.06.2026 10:01]
Lebanese Ministry of Public Health: 3,826 people have been killed and 11,851 injured in Israeli attacks on Lebanon since March 2

Vanessa Beeley, [16.06.2026 10:03]
Zionist bombardment in Nabatieh Al-Fawqa - Kfartebnit

Vanessa Beeley, [16.06.2026 10:11]
VIDEO | "I suggested to Israel to let Syria take care of Hezbollah."

Speaking to reporters on Tuesday at the G7 summit in Evian-les-Bains, France, US President Donald Trump expressed frustration that the Israeli attacks in Lebanon are overshadowing his administration's newly brokered peace accord with Iran, Trump revealed he had pushed Israeli leadership to yield the floor to Syria.

"I suggested to Israel to let Syria take care of Hezbollah," Trump told the press pool ahead of his bilateral meetings, adding, "because to be honest with you, I think they’d do a better job of doing it."

The unexpected proposal underscores a shifting dynamic under self-imposed Syrian President Ahmad al-Sharaa, whom Trump praised as "very capable" and highly cooperative with Washington's requests.

Vanessa Beeley, [16.06.2026 11:02]
A serious escalation
The drone raided Mayfadoun and Shoukin public road 4 times: 3 of them targeted cars, and one targeted the residents who gathered after the targeting of the first car. According to the preliminary toll, 4 martyrs ascended.

Rerum Novarum // Intel, Breaking News, and Alerts 🇺🇸, [15.06.2026 01:08]
🇺🇸🇪🇸🥊⚡- The American Justin Gaethje has defeated Ilia Topuria at UFC Freedom 250 to capture the UFC Lightweight Championship in one of the biggest upsets in the history of the sport.

Rerum Novarum // Intel, Breaking News, and Alerts 🇺🇸, [15.06.2026 03:05]
🇺🇸🇱🇧🇮🇱⚡- "We oppose the withdrawal of the IDF from Lebanon, despite all the pressures that exist and those that will still come.

Prime Minister Netanyahu made this clear to President Trump and senior U.S. officials. I reiterated it yesterday to Secretary of Defense Pete Hegseth.

We will not compromise on Israel's supreme security interests and the protection of our citizens, and we will not withdraw from the security zones.

If Iran attacks Israel over the events in Lebanon, we will strike it with full force and clearly demonstrate to it the disparity in power," - Israel Katz, Israeli Defense Minister.

Rerum Novarum // Intel, Breaking News, and Alerts 🇺🇸, [15.06.2026 03:07]
🇺🇸🇮🇷🇮🇱⚡- "An agreement with Iran would be shocking for Israel, and no one in the Israeli leadership, from the Prime Minister to the Chief of Staff, believes in the deal," - A senior Israeli official tells Israeli Channel 13.

Rerum Novarum // Intel, Breaking News, and Alerts 🇺🇸, [15.06.2026 03:08]
🇺🇸🇱🇧🇮🇱⚡- "We are waiting for clarifications from the political level about the agreement between America and Iran. So far, there are no demands for an Israeli withdrawal from Lebanon, but there are many issues that need clarification," - An Israeli official tells Walla.

Rerum Novarum // Intel, Breaking News, and Alerts 🇺🇸, [15.06.2026 10:53]
🇺🇸🇫🇷🇨🇭⚡- President Trump has arrived in Geneva to attend the G7 summit in Évian, France, just across the border.

Rerum Novarum // Intel, Breaking News, and Alerts 🇺🇸, [15.06.2026 12:07]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️- BREAKING: President Trump, Vice President JD Vance, and Iranian Parliament Speaker Mohammad Bagher Ghalibaf have electronically signed the Memorandum of Understanding.

Rerum Novarum // Intel, Breaking News, and Alerts 🇺🇸, [15.06.2026 12:09]
🇺🇸🇮🇷🇮🇱⚡️- Israel’s withdrawal from Lebanon is not a condition of the deal, a U.S. official tells Reuters. 

Israel will retain the right to defend itself from any future Hezbollah attacks.

Rerum Novarum // Intel, Breaking News, and Alerts 🇺🇸, [15.06.2026 15:56]
🇺🇸🇺🇸⚡️ — California Governor Gavin Newsom says the Trump administration’s Justice Department is investigating him and his wife.

➡️ He says President Trump is pursuing a political vendetta, arguing that officials are "trying to find a crime" despite no evidence of wrongdoing.

➡️ He noted that he is being targeted because he is considering a presidential run, calling him the "most corrupt president in American history."

Rerum Novarum // Intel, Breaking News, and Alerts 🇺🇸, [15.06.2026 16:00]
🇺🇸⚡️- A B-52 bomber crashed shortly after takeoff at Edwards Air Force Base in California. 

The runway is covered with a smoldering burn mark, where first responders are operating. It's unclear what the status of the crew is, nor the condition of the aircraft.

Rerum Novarum // Intel, Breaking News, and Alerts 🇺🇸, [15.06.2026 16:31]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — U.S. officials told Axios that the full text of the memorandum of understanding will be released in the next 24–48 hours.

Rerum Novarum // Intel, Breaking News, and Alerts 🇺🇸, [15.06.2026 17:15]
🇮🇷⚡️- IRGC Quds Force Commander Esmail Qaani was seen publicly for the first time in several months on Iranian state television.

He made trips to Iraq to coordinate and strategize with multiple Iranian-backed Iraqi militias before the war began and sent IRGC Quds Force members to Lebanon to decentralize Hezbollah’s military structure.

Rerum Novarum // Intel, Breaking News, and Alerts 🇺🇸, [15.06.2026 18:07]
🇺🇸⚡️- BREAKING: 8 crew members of the B-52 bomber that crashed at Edwards Air Force Base are believed to be dead, according to CNN.

Rerum Novarum // Intel, Breaking News, and Alerts 🇺🇸, [15.06.2026 18:13]
🇺🇸 - Another angle showing the devastation following the B-52 crash at Edwards Air Force Base.

Rerum Novarum // Intel, Breaking News, and Alerts 🇺🇸, [15.06.2026 19:00]
🇩🇰🇪🇺🇮🇱🇵🇸⚡️ — Danish Foreign Minister Lars Løkke Rasmussen:
Denmark has for a long time called for EU sanctions on Ben-Gvir and Smotrich but also to take action against exports from the illegal settlements in the West Bank.

I sense that there is also some momentum for this in Europe. Unfortunately, I am quite sure that we don't have a majority for that yet.

But the Danish government is working towards that.

Rerum Novarum // Intel, Breaking News, and Alerts 🇺🇸, [15.06.2026 19:19]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️- “Iran has agreed to never have a Nuclear Weapon! Also, the story that the U.S. is paying Iran 300 million Dollars is Fake News, put out by the Dumocrats!!! President DJT” - President Trump on Truth Social.

Rerum Novarum // Intel, Breaking News, and Alerts 🇺🇸, [15.06.2026 21:32]
🇺🇸⚡️- Should be noted that this DOJ investigation began during the Biden Administration after whistleblower complaints about his wife's nonprofit.

Rerum Novarum // Intel, Breaking News, and Alerts 🇺🇸, [15.06.2026 23:02]
🇺🇸⚡️- Governor Newsom asked an American Indian tribe to donate to his wife's nonprofit after he used his office to block a rival tribe from building a casino in Northern California.

Rerum Novarum // Intel, Breaking News, and Alerts 🇺🇸, [16.06.2026 00:05]
🇮🇱🇮🇷⚡️- The Times of Israel on the unceremonious end of the Iran War.

Rerum Novarum // Intel, Breaking News, and Alerts 🇺🇸, [16.06.2026 04:09]
🇺🇦❌🇷🇺 — Ukrainian drones attacked the Moscow Refinery in Kapotnya, Russia, early this morning, causing a massive fire at the facility.

➡️ At least 60 drones have been intercepted in the Moscow region over the past few hours.

Rerum Novarum // Intel, Breaking News, and Alerts 🇺🇸, [16.06.2026 04:38]
🇱🇧🇮🇱⚡️- Lebanese media reports that an Israeli UAV carried out a single strike against a vehicle in southern Lebanon.

Rerum Novarum // Intel, Breaking News, and Alerts 🇺🇸, [16.06.2026 06:07]
🇨🇩⚡️- The Red Cross estimates the Ebola outbreak's peak in the DRC is yet to come. They assess the outbreak could last up to a year.

Rerum Novarum // Intel, Breaking News, and Alerts 🇺🇸, [16.06.2026 06:12]
🇫🇷⚡- The G7 summit in Évian, France, has begun.

Rerum Novarum // Intel, Breaking News, and Alerts 🇺🇸, [16.06.2026 06:14]
🇺🇸🇫🇷🇮🇷⚡- "We have a good and fair agreement with Iran, but we're not investing money there. 

The agreement with Iran is moving to the second phase, but there is work to be done," - President Trump at the G7 summit in Évian, France.

Rerum Novarum // Intel, Breaking News, and Alerts 🇺🇸, [16.06.2026 06:16]
🇺🇸🇫🇷🇮🇷⚡- "Bibi [Netanyahu] begged Obama not to make the [JCPOA] deal. But Obama did, he was on the side of Iran. It was terrible," - President Trump at the G7 summit in Évian, France.

Rerum Novarum // Intel, Breaking News, and Alerts 🇺🇸, [16.06.2026 06:18]
🇺🇸🇫🇷🇮🇱⚡- "I have a great relationship with Bibi [Netanyahu] but he has to be more responsible when it comes to Lebanon. Lebanon was a great country, with great intellect, now it's just terrible," - President Trump at the G7 summit in Évian, France.

Rerum Novarum // Intel, Breaking News, and Alerts 🇺🇸, [16.06.2026 06:19]
🇺🇸🇫🇷🇸🇾⚡- "I suggested to Israel to let Syria take care of Hezbollah. To be honest with you, they would have done a better job," - President Trump at the G7 summit in Évian, France.

Rerum Novarum // Intel, Breaking News, and Alerts 🇺🇸, [16.06.2026 06:21]
🇺🇸🇫🇷🇶🇦⚡- "Working with the tough people of Qatar was a real pleasure. They are the closest to Iran physically. Other countries have to travel 45 minutes to get there, with Qatar, you could walk right across the border. So Qatar was in a more dangerous position," - President Trump at the G7 summit in Évian, France.

Note, Iran and Qatar do not share a land border despite Trump's claims.

Rerum Novarum // Intel, Breaking News, and Alerts 🇺🇸, [16.06.2026 06:23]
🇺🇸🇫🇷🇸🇾⚡- "The Syrian president has done a great job and has managed to unite his country," - President Trump at the G7 summit in Évian, France.

Rerum Novarum // Intel, Breaking News, and Alerts 🇺🇸, [16.06.2026 06:27]
🇺🇸🇫🇷🇺🇦⚡- "Iran is no longer the main focus, Ukraine is a priority. I had a very good meeting with [Ukraine's President] Zelensky. Russia needs to make a deal, they have lost tremendous amounts of people, mostly soldiers," - President Trump at the G7 summit in Évian, France.

Rerum Novarum // Intel, Breaking News, and Alerts 🇺🇸, [16.06.2026 06:30]
🇺🇸🇫🇷🇮🇷⚡- "We talk to Iran about killing their own people. But I will say, the majority of that took place during the first and second regimes, much more so than now," - President Trump at the G7 summit in Évian, France.

Rerum Novarum // Intel, Breaking News, and Alerts 🇺🇸, [16.06.2026 06:32]
🇺🇸🇫🇷🇺🇦 - Trump's meeting with Zelensky on the G7 sidelines. They were later joined by Rustem Umerov and Marco Rubio.

Rerum Novarum // Intel, Breaking News, and Alerts 🇺🇸, [16.06.2026 06:36]
🇺🇸🇱🇧🇮🇱⚡- "Trump is pressuring Netanyahu to withdraw from Lebanon by Friday," - Shirit Avitan Cohen of Israel Hayom.

Rerum Novarum // Intel, Breaking News, and Alerts 🇺🇸, [16.06.2026 06:38]
🇮🇱⚡- Israeli Prime Minister Netanyahu's court testimony has been shortened to allow him to chair an emergency security cabinet session right now.

Rerum Novarum // Intel, Breaking News, and Alerts 🇺🇸, [16.06.2026 06:39]
🇺🇸🇫🇷🇱🇧⚡- "Israel has been fighting Lebanon for too long and too many people are being killed. You don't have to knock down an apartment house every time you're looking for somebody. There are a lot of people in those apartment houses and they're not all Hezbollah," - President Trump at the G7 summit in Évian, France.

Rerum Novarum // Intel, Breaking News, and Alerts 🇺🇸, [16.06.2026 06:51]
🇱🇧🇮🇱⚡- The US-Iran deal includes a Lebanon clause which will allow Israel to operate with freedom of Lebanese territory, and continue its military operations there, Haaretz, citing a Pakistani source, reports.

Rerum Novarum // Intel, Breaking News, and Alerts 🇺🇸, [16.06.2026 06:53]
🇺🇸🇫🇷🇶🇦 - President Trump spent a good portion of his press conference with the Qatari delegation on the G7 summit sidelines blasting Israel and Netanyahu.

Rerum Novarum // Intel, Breaking News, and Alerts 🇺🇸, [16.06.2026 07:07]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡- BREAKING: "US President Donald Trump is considering dismissing a series of senior administration officials who opposed the agreement with Iran, including War Secretary Pete Hegseth and CIA Director John Ratcliffe.

The person who, for the time being, appears to be enjoying immunity is Secretary of State Marco Rubio. Among other things, he has been very careful not to criticize the agreement and also enjoys considerable popularity," - U.S. sources tell Israel Hayom.

Rerum Novarum // Intel, Breaking News, and Alerts 🇺🇸, [16.06.2026 07:12]
🇺🇸🇮🇷🇱🇧⚡- Iran's Ministry of Foreign Affairs states the U.S. has begun easing its naval blockade of Iranian ports. Iran also declared any Israeli attack on Lebanon would be in violation of the Memorandum of Understanding, contradicting an earlier Haaretz report that alleged Israel would retain freedom of action over Lebanon.

Rerum Novarum // Intel, Breaking News, and Alerts 🇺🇸, [16.06.2026 07:14]
🇺🇸🇮🇷🇮🇱⚡- "The Iran-US agreement is a personal blow to Israeli Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu.

Israeli and American goals in Iran have become less aligned, and the agreement will leave Tel Aviv without any strategic gains," - The Economist.

Rerum Novarum // Intel, Breaking News, and Alerts 🇺🇸, [16.06.2026 07:17]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡- IRIB confirms, the U.S. has begun lifting its naval blockade of Iranian ports.

IRIB however reports that vessels must continue coordinating with the IRGC while passing through the Strait of Hormuz.

Rerum Novarum // Intel, Breaking News, and Alerts 🇺🇸, [16.06.2026 09:35]
🇬🇧⚡️- Technology Secretary Liz Kendall has alluded that the Government will likely ban VPN's later this year after the initial social media ban passes.

Rerum Novarum // Intel, Breaking News, and Alerts 🇺🇸, [16.06.2026 09:55]
🇬🇧⚡️- The Rape Gang Inquiry Report has been officially published by Rupert Lowe. 

Full report can be read here: https://t.co/EuKgGWBRhS

Rerum Novarum // Intel, Breaking News, and Alerts 🇺🇸, [16.06.2026 11:01]
🇱🇧🇮🇱⚡- Three Israeli airstrikes on Mayfadoun, southern Lebanon.


Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 00:16]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — Asian stock markets surged on Monday after the announcement of a deal to end the Iran War.

Japan’s Nikkei 225 jumped 5.5%, while South Korea’s KOSPI rose as much as 5.7%.

Taiwan’s Taiex gained up to 2.7%, Australia’s ASX 200 climbed about 1.5%, and Hong Kong’s Hang Seng Index initially rose around 1% before trimming gains.

U.S. stock futures also advanced, with S&P 500 futures up 1%, Nasdaq futures rising 1.8%, and Dow futures gaining 0.8%.

Meanwhile, Brent crude fell about 4.5%, dropping below $83.40 per barrel as concerns over disruptions in the Strait of Hormuz eased.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 02:44]
🇷🇺🇺🇦⚡️ — Additional footage from the Kyiv Pechersk Lavra after the recent Russian attack on Kyiv.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 04:49]
🇮🇱🇱🇧⚡️ — Israeli officials have not been asked to withdraw from southern Lebanon, Channel 12 reports.​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 04:53]
🇾🇪⚡️ — UKMTO reports an incident 14 nautical miles south off the coast of Yemen.

➡️ A container vessel was approached by a small skiff whose crew opened fire and attempted to board the vessel.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 04:57]
🇮🇱🇱🇧⚡️ — NEW: Israeli Defense Minister Israel Katz says the IDF will remain in security zones in Lebanon, Syria, and Gaza indefinitely to protect borders and settlements, with PM Netanyahu leading the same policy.

➡️ Areas will be kept “free of local residents” and terror infrastructure will be destroyed, including in border villages.

➡️ Katz says Israel opposes IDF withdrawal from Lebanon — the position has been made clear to President Trump and senior US officials.

➡️ If Iran attacks Israel following events in Lebanon, Israel will respond “with full force,” Katz says.​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 04:58]
🇮🇱❌🇱🇧⚡️— NOW: Israeli artillery shelling targets Nabatieh al-Fawqa and Kfar Tebnit in southern Lebanon.​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 05:01]
🇮🇱🇮🇷⚡️ — IDF Spokesperson announces a change in Home Front Command defense policy effective today, Monday June 15, until Tuesday June 16 at 20:00, citing a situation assessment.

Gathering limit of up to 5,000 people has been removed across all areas of the country.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 05:16]
🇮🇱🇺🇸🇮🇷🇱🇧⚡️ — Israeli Finance Minister Bezalel Smotrich:
The agreement with Iran is bad for Israel and for the entire free world.

Period. The joint campaign had many achievements in weakening Iran, and they will not go to waste. We will have to continue the campaign to topple the regime ourselves and in creative ways, and ensure that Iran will never have nuclear weapons.

None of the candidates who see themselves as fit for the premiership would withstand even ten percent of the pressure currently being applied to the Israeli government, and especially to the one at its head.

In Lebanon, we will be tested. This is our war, our fighters, and the immediate security of our northern residents.

I will continue to act so that we continue to stand firm on ours and allow the IDF full freedom of action to continue pushing Hezbollah away.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 05:20]
🇬🇧⚡️ — The UK government has announced plans to ban children under 16 from using major social media platforms starting in early 2027.  

➡️ The proposed restrictions would apply to apps including TikTok, Instagram, Snapchat, Facebook, YouTube, and X.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 05:21]
🇮🇱❌🇱🇧 — Israeli artillery fire targets Ali al-Taher Hill in the Nabatieh district, southern Lebanon.​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 05:25]
🇮🇱🇺🇸🇮🇷🇱🇧⚡️ — Israeli Minister of National Security Ben-Gvir:
Trump's agreement does not bind us. Israel is not subject to the United States, and we are an independent and sovereign nation!

Our duty is to the citizens of Israel, to the soldiers of the IDF, and to the Jewish people, and our historical duty to the persecuted and murdered Jews over thousands of years of exile, to provide security to Jews in the Land of Israel.

Every time we succumbed to international pressure at the expense of Israel's security, we paid a blood price with interest. It was true in the Oslo Accords, it was true in the Lebanon agreement in 2006, and it was true in every period of containment in Gaza that exploded in our faces.

We emphasize: We love the USA and are grateful to President Trump. And yet, the State of Israel is not a banana republic.

I say these things to the Prime Minister all the time, and repeat them in closed rooms at every important historical juncture: In historical moments, a historical decision must be made.

My position is clear: We are not partners to this agreement that does not

ensure our security, and it does not bind us in any way. We must not compromise on anything less than the dismantling of Hezbollah, we must not withdraw from any territory that our fighters have captured and cleared of terror infrastructure, we must not return to a situation where thousands of terrorists sit on the fences of northern settlements, and certainly we must not remain silent for a moment in the face of fire directed at the State of Israel.

We must make it clear: Every launch of a drone, UAV, or missile toward Israel from Lebanon will lead to an Israeli strike in Dahiya. That was the deterrence balance just a few months ago, and we must not give it up in any way.

And above all, we must make it clear to everyone: The people of Israel is a people of 3,000 years, the eternal people that does not fear a long road; we have faith in the Creator of the Universe, we are a strong and proud people that returned to its homeland strong and proud, and does not intend to lower its gaze before enemies anymore. 

The days are over when the Jew took blows and kept silent. Never again!

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 05:27]
🇵🇰🇮🇷🇺🇸🇨🇭⚡️ — Pakistan's Prime Minister Shehbaz Sharif:
The formal ceremony for this historic agreement will take place in Geneva on the blessed Friday, June 19th, and by the grace and mercy of Allah, Pakistan will host this ceremony.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 05:29]
🇮🇱🇱🇧🇺🇸⚡️ — An Israeli official told Walla:
We are waiting for clarifications from the political level about the agreement between America and Iran. 

So far, there are no demands for an Israeli withdrawal from Lebanon, but there are many issues that need clarification.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 05:32]
🇮🇱❌🇱🇧 — An Israeli drone is flying over Beirut and its southern suburbs.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 05:33]
🇱🇧🇮🇱🇺🇸⚡️ — Lebanese President Joseph Aoun on the MoU: 
The Lebanese people, especially those in areas affected by attacks and destruction who have lost loved ones, livelihoods, and homes, are looking forward to these understandings being translated into practical steps that will put a definitive end to the cycle of violence and lay the foundations for a phase of stability, security, recovery, and reconstruction.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 05:37]
🇮🇱⚡️ — Early gains on the Tel Aviv Stock Exchange have reversed into losses, with leading indices plunging approximately 1.5% against the global trend, Channel 12 reports.​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 05:43]
🇱🇧🇱🇧❌🇮🇱 — WATCH: Hezbollah releases footage dated May 29 showing its fighters striking an Israeli army armored personnel carrier in the town of Ainata, southern Lebanon, using an Ababil FPV drone.​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 06:56]
🇮🇱🇺🇸🇱🇧🇮🇷⚡️ — Israeli opposition leader Benny Gantz warns Israel must not agree to restrictions on its freedom of action in Lebanon or any withdrawal that endangers northern residents.

The emerging agreement with Iran appears to be a strategic failure that will require Israel to engage in a political, military, and legal struggle in the coming years, one that can only be led by a broad Zionist government.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 07:31]
🇬🇧🇵🇸⚡️ — The UK Court of Appeal has ruled that the government’s decision to designate Palestine Action as a terrorist organization was lawful, overturning a February High Court ruling that found the proscription unlawful.

➡️ Five Court of Appeal judges concluded that the government’s decision to proscribe the group “struck a fair balance.”

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 08:00]
🇱🇧🇮🇱🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — A Hezbollah official told Reuters the group has not carried out any operations since the U.S.-Iran deal was announced, stressing that its position on the Lebanon ceasefire depends on Israel’s compliance.

The official rejected any Israeli “freedom of movement” in Lebanon. 

The official also said Iran delayed signing the agreement with Washington in order to monitor Israel’s compliance with the ceasefire in Lebanon.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 08:05]
🇮🇷🇺🇸🇱🇧🇮🇱⚡️ — Iranian Foreign Ministry spokesperson Esmaeil Baqaei:
Lebanon and ending the war in Lebanon are an integral part of the understanding to end the war. 

Lebanon appears three times in the MoU.

We have shown in the past that we are determined in this regard. In practice, we have proven that we are serious.

In the future, we will certainly closely monitor developments and wherever necessary, we will use all our tools to ensure the commitments of the other parties are fulfilled.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 08:33]
🇮🇷🇺🇸🇱🇧🇮🇱⚡️ — Iranian Foreign Ministry spokesperson Esmaeil Baqaei:
It is the United States that must ensure that the Zionist regime adheres to the understanding.

Failure to implement the understanding will result in a halt of implementation on our part.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 08:35]
🇮🇷🇺🇸⚡️ — Iranian Foreign Ministry spokesperson Esmaeil Baqaei:
The Americans once intervened in the issue of transferring nuclear materials abroad and saw the result, so if they are wise, they will not repeat it.

We did not discuss details of the nuclear issue in the text of the memorandum of understanding. It has been generally agreed that within a 60-day period after signing the memorandum, talks will be held between Iran and the U.S. regarding the nuclear issue and the reciprocal lifting of sanctions.

The nuclear issue is clear, and regarding some aspects of it, including enrichment and also stocks of highly enriched uranium, the position is clear. These two topics are to be discussed during that time frame.

We did not discuss details here, and Iran's positions on both topics have been clear, but we must wait and see how developments proceed during the 60 days of negotiation.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 08:37]
🇮🇷🇺🇸🇮🇱⚡️ — Iranian Foreign Ministry spokesperson Esmaeil Baqaei:
We have no trust in the Zionist regime and America. It has been proven that both have not been honest in fulfilling their commitments in the past.

We have our own tools, and America must fulfill its commitments according to this memorandum of understanding and ensure that the Zionist regime also fulfills its commitments regarding the cessation of war in Lebanon.

Failure to fulfill these commitments will naturally lead to a reciprocal action by Iran.

Commitments are mutual, and no one can expect the Islamic Republic of Iran to fulfill its commitments while the other party refuses to fulfill theirs.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 08:49]
🇺🇦🇷🇺⚡️ — Ukrainian President Zelensky visited the Kyiv Pechersk Lavra monastery to inspect the damage it endured during Russia’s overnight attack.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 08:49]
🇮🇷🇴🇲🇺🇸⚡️ — Iranian Foreign Ministry spokesperson Esmaeil Baqaei:
According to the memorandum of understanding, Iran, as the coastal state, in cooperation with Oman and in consultation with stakeholders, ensures the security and safe passage of ships in this strategic waterway.

These supervisory and supportive actions are implemented in line with the commitments of the other party and fully preserve Iran's sovereign position.

Iran is not merely seeking to collect fees, but will design and collect costs related to navigation services, environmental protection, and ship insurance provided by Iran and Oman.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 08:52]
🇺🇸⚡️ — President Trump vibing at last night's White House UFC Freedom 250 event.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 09:06]
🇷🇺❌🇺🇦 — OVERVIEW: Russia launched more than 60 missiles at Kyiv in the overnight combined missile and drone attack.

At least five people were killed and 28 people injured by the strikes.

Iskander-M ballistic missiles, Kh-101 cruise missiles, Zircon hypersonic cruise missiles, and Iskander-K cruise missiles were used in the attack.

600+ Geran-2 and Gerbera drones were also launched as part of the attack.

In total, Ukraine's says Russia launched 70 missiles and 611 drones into Ukraine overnight. The recorded interception rate is the lowest in some time.

Russia’s MoD stated that the strikes targeted Ukraine’s military-industrial facilities in Kyiv, Dnipro, and Kharkiv, along with military airbases and territorial recruitment centers.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 09:08]
🇷🇺❌🇺🇦 — In the overnight attack on Kyiv, Russia used the new "Banderol" loitering munition, a drone-missile with a range of up to 500 km and a warhead weighing up to 150 kg, according to RBC-Ukraine.

The weapon was developed by the sanctioned Russian company Kronstadt and is primarily designed to be launched from the Orion drone, with adaptations also being made for the Mi-28N attack helicopter.

The Banderol can fly at speeds of around 500 km/h, uses aviation kerosene, and is capable of tighter turns than many Russian cruise missiles while maintaining a similar flight profile. 

Its main advantage over the Shahed drone is its much higher speed, which makes it more difficult for Ukrainian air defenses to intercept.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 09:08]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — President Trump via Truth Social:
Ships are starting to move, many loaded up with Oil, out of the Strait of Hormuz. 

They are going along the Southern “Highway,” which is totally safe, secure, and pristine. There are other areas of travel, also!!!

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 09:15]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — Vice President JD Vance on Iran:
We are now speaking directly to the Iranian system. We have some good relationships there.

We are not passing messages through backchannels anymore; we are actually talking to them.

When you talk to them, you figure out what's real, what's fake, what they're serious about, and what they're not serious about.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 09:16]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — Vice President JD Vance on Iran:
We fundamentally have all the cards here.

We don't have to give the Iranians anything if they don't make the commitments that we want long-term on the nuclear program. 

And even if we just stopped here, what would be true? Their military is destroyed. The Straits of Hormuz are open. Their nuclear program has been destroyed. And we have incredible economic leverage over them.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 09:17]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — Vice President JD Vance on Iran:
We are extending an open hand to Iran. If they want to change their relationship with us, we will change our relationship with Iran.

That's the offer.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 09:18]
🇺🇸🇮🇷🇮🇱⚡️ — Vice President JD Vance:
I think there are elements within Israel that like the deal quite a bit.

One of the interesting things about the Iranian state media is that sometimes you'll have hardline elements really aiming at a domestic audience trying to sell the deal and in some ways honestly misrepresent the deal.

And then sometimes you'll see certain elements in the Israeli media pick that up and run with it.

I think when people see this deal — we hope to release the text this week — they're going to realize that this is going to make the whole region safer.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 09:19]
🇺🇸⚡️ — President Trump via Truth Social:
The UFC at the White House last night was incredible. The weather was scheduled to be horrendous, and it turned out to be PERFECT! So much for weather predicting. 

The Fighters were outstanding — Bo Nickal, Justin Gaethje, Ciryl Gane, Sean O’Malley, Josh Hokit, Mauricio Ruffy, and Diego Lopes were all unbelievable! Most people have never seen anything like that kind of human speed and power before.

The White House has never looked more beautiful. The setting was unsurpassed! Congratulations to Dana White, and his unbelievable UFC. One of the most exciting days in the History of our fabled White House!

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 09:20]
🇺🇸🇮🇷🇮🇱🇸🇦⚡️ — Vice President JD Vance:
The entire Gulf coalition hated Obama's Iran deal because they felt it empowered Iran to be a bad actor.

What is the Gulf coalition saying about President Trump's peace deal? They love it because they see it as an opportunity to build and create a new Middle East.

I think that new Middle East, certainly Israel, is going to have a seat at the table. We think this is going to be great for everybody in the region. But most importantly, we think it's going to be great for the American people.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 09:23]
🇺🇸⚡️ — President Trump via Truth Social:
Sadly, if you import people from Third World Countries, you quickly become a Third World Country — And there’s not a thing you can do about it. 

MAKE AMERICA GREAT AGAIN!

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 09:25]
🇷🇺⚡️ — A Russian Tu-22M3 strategic bomber crashed in Russia’s Irkutsk region earlier today.

➡️ Russian media reports that the pilots ejected safely and that the bomber wasn't equipped with ammunition.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 09:28]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — Vice President JD Vance on Iran:
The agreement is fundamentally built around a two-step verification process.

We say to the Iranians, “You are welcome to have access to an unsanctioned economy. You’re welcome to be re-invited into the world economy, but only if you honor the commitments that you make in this agreement.”

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 09:29]
🇷🇺⚡️ — Russia's MoD:
The Tu-22M3 crew safely ejected and survived. 

No damage was reported on the ground, the bomber was not carrying any weapons, and a commission of the Main Command of the Aerospace Forces is working at the scene.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 09:31]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — Vice President JD Vance on Iran:
We are seeing both Iranian hardliners and political leaders saying, “Our relationship with the U.S. over the past 47 years has been a mistake. Let's turn over a new leaf.”

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 09:35]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — Vice President JD Vance on Iran:
We are saying to the Iranians: if you negotiate in good faith and make a long-term commitment not to develop nuclear weapons, then we're going to make sure your country is successful.

If, however, they refuse to meet us halfway, we're going to continue applying the pressure that we've seen build up economically, particularly, and that's going to be bad for them.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 09:37]
🇮🇱🇮🇷⚡️ — Israeli Finance Minister Bezalel Smotrich:
Israel will continue to act with every tool at its disposal to overthrow this murderous regime in Iran.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 09:38]
🇮🇱🇺🇸⚡️ — Israeli Finance Minister Bezalel Smotrich:
The diplomatic, security, and international pressure being exerted during this period on the Government of Israel, and especially on the person leading it, is unprecedented.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 09:51]
🇮🇱🇺🇸⚡️ — Israeli National Security Minister Ben-Gvir:
A sovereign state is not a subcontractor of any superpower. It is not obligated to agreements that shut down its ability to defend its people.

In the face of existential threats, we must not act under external pressure, but according to our own conscience.

Just as a person is obligated to do what is necessary to protect his home, the State of Israel is obligated to do everything necessary to protect its citizens.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 09:51]
🇮🇱🇵🇸🇱🇧🇮🇷⚡️ — Israeli National Security Minister Ben-Gvir:
History teaches us that every time we chose the path of restraint, surrender, or reliance on an illusion of quiet, we received more terror, more terror, and more terror. 

I say clearly to our dear Prime Minister: the period of endless rounds of fighting is over. Not in Gaza, not in Lebanon, not in Iran.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 09:52]
🇮🇱🇱🇧⚡️ — Israeli National Security Minister Ben-Gvir:
I demand that Prime Minister Netanyahu allow IDF soldiers to continue to defend themselves and the State of Israel.

We must continue destroying the houses in southern Lebanon. We must continue pushing the residents away from southern Lebanon. We must continue eliminating Hezbollah terrorists in Lebanon.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 09:55]
🇮🇱❌🇱🇧🇱🇧 — Israeli National Security Minister Ben-Gvir:
For every drone and missile that is launched at us, we need to respond to it unequivocally and also respond in the Dahieh.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 09:58]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — Stephanopoulos: Earlier, Trump said there would be "no deal with Iran except unconditional surrender." Why did he reverse course and agree to this deal now?

JD Vance: I don't think he reversed course. Fundamentally, Trump's argument was that we're going to use the military to exert pressure on Iran, and we're going to get something good for the American people. And now we have that.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 09:58]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — Vice President JD Vance on Iran:
What Trump really wanted to do—not just over the last six weeks, but really over the last year and a half of Iran policy—was get us to a place where we could fundamentally change our relationship with the Iranians and ensure that they never have a nuclear weapon. 

We feel that we're at that place now.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 10:00]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — Vice President JD Vance on the Iran deal:
We'll be releasing the text this week.

Iran doesn't get a dime of money unless they perform their obligations. And the money that we're talking about is fundamentally sanctions relief. 

We're not giving them American money—not a single dollar of American money will go to Iran. 

We are willing to give significant sanctions relief if the Iranians make the kind of long-term commitments that are necessary to be a normal country, to give up their nuclear weapons program, and to stop funding terrorist activities all over the Middle East.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 10:04]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — NEW: Vice President JD Vance on Iran:
We already signed the deal digitally yesterday, and no money has been released. That won't change.

This is a performance-based thing.

If we see the Iranians taking action to eliminate their stockpile of enriched material and allow the kind of verification regime that we need to see to know that they're not going to build a nuclear weapon, yes, sanctions relief will follow.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 10:06]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — CBS: The Iranians are saying they're gonna have access to a $300 billion reconstruction fund. True or false?

JD Vance: That's the sort of things they could have access to, so long as they honor their end of the obligation.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 10:12]
🇬🇧🇷🇺⚡️ — A BBC investigation found that Russia was behind a wider sabotage and disinformation campaign in the UK that included arson attacks targeting properties linked to Prime Minister Keir Starmer.

The attacks were carried out by Ukrainian national Roman Lavrynovych, who was recruited through Telegram by a handler known as “EL.” BBC investigators linked EL to Evgeny Lyukshin, a young Russian diplomat with ties to Russian information warfare networks, though authorities have not publicly confirmed his identity as the handler.

Three separate arson attacks targeted properties and a car linked to Keir Starmer.

The network operated fake far-right and Islamist groups online, including “Direct Action UK” and the “Takbir Foundation,” which paid individuals to carry out provocative acts such as anti-Muslim and pro-Islamist graffiti to inflame social tensions.

The campaign also spread false narratives about the Starmer arson case online, including claims amplified by far-right activist Tommy Robinson. 

British and Ukrainian sources told the BBC they privately concluded that Russia was behind the operation, although the Metropolitan Police stated they had not obtained sufficient evidence to officially classify the attacks as a state-backed Russian operation. 

The Russian Embassy denies any involvement, saying Moscow poses no threat to Britain.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 10:18]
🇺🇸🇨🇭🇫🇷⚡️ — NOW: President Trump arrives in Geneva, Switzerland, for the G7 summit in Évian-les-Bains, France, just across the border.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 10:21]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — Vice President JD Vance on Iran:
Trump wants to turn over a leaf with Iran of 47 years of a failed relationship between the U.S. and Iran, but that requires the Iranians to actually honor their end of the bargain.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 10:22]
🇺🇸🇮🇷🇸🇦⚡️ — Vice President JD Vance on Iran:
We are absolutely open to Gulf countries investing in Iran’s reconstruction, but only if Iran ends their nuclear program, ends their enriched stockpile of material and is really open to an inspections and enforcement regime that gives the American people confidence they're never going to have a nuclear weapon.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 10:23]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — Vice President JD Vance on Iran:
The Iranian media, especially the hardline media, is going to talk about what they get without talking about what they give.

It's important for all of us to correct that record.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 10:27]
🇪🇺🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — European Commission President Ursula von der Leyen:
We welcome the agreement reached between the United States and Iran. The priority now is implementation. 

The Straits of Hormuz must reopen, and freedom of navigation must be restored toll-free. This is essential for the regional stability and, of course, also for the global economy. 

The agreement should open the door to wider talks and lead to the end of Iran's nuclear and ballistic programs.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 10:28]
🇪🇺🇮🇱🇱🇧⚡️ — European Commission President Ursula von der Leyen:
There can be no lasting peace while Lebanon remains in flames. 

We call for a genuine ceasefire and the full respect for Lebanon's sovereignty.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 10:35]
🇺🇸🇮🇱🇵🇸⚡️ — FIFA is proposing that Israel and Palestine play the opening match of its inaugural Under-15 football festival in the U.S. this September, according to The Athletic.

The initiative follows FIFA President Gianni Infantino’s unsuccessful effort to bring together representatives of the Israel Football Association and the Palestinian Football Association for a symbolic handshake and photo at FIFA’s congress in Vancouver in April.

FIFA hopes the Israel–Palestine match can serve as the opening fixture of the new youth festival.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 10:42]
🇩🇪🪖🇷🇺⚡️ — Luftwaffe chief Lt. Gen. Holger Neumann told The Telegraph that Germany is prepared to “fight tonight” and defend “every inch” of NATO territory in the event of a Russian attack.

Neumann stressed that NATO has “no zones of different security,” meaning an attack on Estonia would be treated the same as an attack on London under the alliance’s collective defense commitments.

He said that if NATO were forced into a conflict, it could target strategic Russian areas such as Kaliningrad, the Kola Peninsula, and the Black Sea region.

“Fight tonight means if someone calls me now... we have to be ready now — and we are ready,” Neumann said.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 10:49]
🇮🇱❌🇱🇧 — An Israeli drone strike targeted a car in Kfar Tebnit, southern Lebanon, killing the driver.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 10:50]
🇮🇱❌🇱🇧 — A journalist was injured by a grenade dropped from an Israeli drone in Kfar Tebnit, southern Lebanon.

➡️ He was taken to al-Najda al-Shaabiya hospital for treatment.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 11:07]
🇳🇴⚡️ — Marius Borg Høiby, the 29-year-old son of Norway's Crown Princess Mette-Marit, was found guilty of two counts of rape and sentenced to four years in prison by the Oslo District Court.

➡️ The three-judge panel acquitted him on two other rape charges but convicted him on several additional offenses linked to the case.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 11:10]
🇵🇸⚡️ — Palestinian Authority President Mahmoud Abbas announced that presidential elections will take place in 2027.

➡️ Abbas has remained in power for over 20 years, since he won around 65% of the votes in the last election, which took place in 2005.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 11:12]
🇾🇪⚡️ — UKMTO reported that a tanker sailing 111 nautical miles southeast of Aden, Yemen, was approached by a small armed skiff carrying four individuals.

➡️ The crew of the skiff was armed and fired an RPG at the vessel.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 11:17]
🇺🇸🇫🇷⚡️ — President Trump arrived in Évian-les-Bains, France, for the G7 summit.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 11:19]
🇮🇱🤝🇸🇴 — Somaliland's President Abdirahman Mohamed Abdullahi and Israeli Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu held a high-level meeting and officially signed a Strategic Declaration on Cooperation.

Abdullahi said the agreement “lays the foundation for a lasting strategic relationship,” aimed at strengthening cooperation between Somaliland and Israel across various areas.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 11:21]
🇮🇱🤝🇸🇴 — Somaliland has opened its embassy in Jerusalem, becoming the eighth country to have its mission in Jerusalem.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 11:27]
🇸🇾🇪🇬⚡️ — The Syrian Telecommunications Company told SANA that an international submarine cable linking Tartus and Egypt's Alexandria was sabotaged near the Tartus coast.

➡️ The damage has disrupted a significant portion of Syria’s international internet capacity, causing weaker internet services across several provinces.

➡️ The company said specialized teams have been deployed to repair the cable, warning that full restoration of services may take time due to the technical complexity of undersea cable repairs.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 11:33]
🇵🇱🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — Reporter: Is there any hope that the US-Iran deal will last long?

Poland's FM Radosław Sikorski: Inshallah.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 11:37]
🇪🇺🇮🇱🇵🇸⚡️ — EU’s foreign policy chief Kaja Kallas:
Last month, ministers agreed on sanctions against extremist Israeli settlers and Hamas figures.

Many member states have also proposed to sanction Minister Ben Gvir — but no consensus on that was reached today.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 11:40]
🇪🇺🇺🇦⚡️ — European Commission President Ursula von der Leyen on Ukraine’s EU accession:
Today we open the first cluster of EU accession negotiations. This is a huge step forward. 

Ukraine has made remarkable reform progress. 

They have delivered, so now we have to deliver too.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 11:42]
🇮🇷🤝🇺🇸- A senior American official stated in a briefing to reporters that the Memorandum of Understanding has been electronically signed with Iran. Donald Trump and Vice President JD Vance both electronically signed on behalf of the United States, while Iranian Parliament Speaker Mohammad Bagher Ghalibaf signed electronically on behalf of Iran.

@GeoPWatch

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 11:52]
🇪🇬🇦🇪⚡️ — UAE President Mohamed bin Zayed Al Nahyan arrived in Cairo and held talks with Egyptian President Abdel Fattah el-Sisi earlier today, discussing strengthening bilateral relations between the two countries.

➡️ During the meeting, Sisi emphasized that the security of the UAE and the Gulf states “is an integral part of Egypt’s national security,” underscoring Cairo’s commitment to regional stability and close ties with its Gulf partners.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 11:56]
🇬🇧⚡️ — BBC: What was your screen time over the weekend?

Student: Nine hours.

BBC: Suddenly you’re gong to have a lot more time to fill. What will you do?

Student: Stare at a wall.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 12:02]
🇮🇷🇺🇸⚡️ — Iran’s Law Enforcement EOD unit discovered and safely neutralized the 500-kg warhead of a fallen U.S.-made Tomahawk cruise missile near the city of Varamin, Tehran province.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 12:05]
🇸🇾❌🇸🇾 — Syria’s Interior Ministry announced that it is detaining 5,989 former military personnel and officers from the Assad era over alleged crimes and abuses committed under the previous government.

➡️ Those held include senior figures, among them 42 major generals, 172 brigadier generals, and hundreds of other officers.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 12:06]
🇺🇸🇫🇷⚡️ — NOW: President Trump meets with French President Macron on the sidelines of the G7 summit in Évian-les-Bains, France.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 12:08]
🇺🇸🇮🇷🇱🇧🇮🇱⚡️ — Senior U.S. official told Axios:
Israeli withdrawal from southern Lebanon is not a condition of the agreement with Iran. 

If Hezbollah attacks, Israel has the right to self-defense and to respond.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 12:09]
🇺🇸🇫🇷⚡️ — President Trump on Macron:
Emmanuel has been a special friend of mine. We have a fantastic relationship.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 12:11]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — President Trump on Iran:
The deal is all signed. The Strait of Hormuz is already partially open. 

They're doing a little hunting for a couple of mines that they've already found. Ships are starting to go out now. On Friday, it will be completely opened. 

We got along very well with Iran.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 12:11]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — President Trump on Iran:
I felt badly that we had to go back on the attack for two nights. And I thought a third, but we made the deal before that happened. 

I think a lot of great things are going to happen to the Middle East right now.

Oil is plummeting down, and the stock market is shooting up like a rocket.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 12:14]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — President Trump on Iran:
The main thing is that Iran will not have a nuclear weapon. They fully agreed to that.

They won't have a nuclear weapon, which is what it was all about. They probably would've used it if they had it.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 12:15]
🇺🇸🇮🇷🇫🇷⚡️ — President Trump on Iran:
We have done a great job. And hopefully, it's going to be a good relationship, and we're going to get along. And if we don't, we go back to where we started. But I don't think it's going to be necessary. 

The Iran deal that we made is going to bring a lot of success to the world because the oil was really clogged up there for a while. 

Macron would call me on occasion and say, 'Come on, please, let's go to your prices.'

But the oil is coming way down, so I'm very honored.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 12:18]
🇺🇸🇷🇺🇺🇦⚡️ — President Trump on Ukraine-Russia:
We had a very good conversation yesterday with President Zelensky and President Putin. 

And I see maybe we can do something there. I really do. I think they're both open to it. Now that Iran is finished, we're going to be focusing on that.

But I had two very good conversations yesterday. We'll be talking about it.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 12:18]
🇺🇸🇮🇷🇨🇭⚡️ — Reporter: Are you going to try to attend the signing ceremony on Friday?

Trump: Well, it depends. JD's coming in for it — he was originally going to do it. I'll probably be gone by then.

We're going to be staying quite late, so I may be involved, I may not.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 12:20]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — Reporter: When will the text of the MoU be released?

Trump: I think pretty soon. I want it to be released because it's a very powerful document. It's not like the Obama document, which was just a terrible document.  

I would say — sometime after Friday.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 12:20]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — Reporter: Mr. President, does the deal involve any early sanctions relief for Iran? When would that go into effect?

Trump: No, it doesn't. It's really a behavioral thing.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 12:21]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — President Trump on the Strait of Hormuz:
It's toll-free. We had a little argument about that. It's toll-free, so I don't think we're going to need much help.

But I don't think it's a bad idea to have a ship or two up there — a few countries. You'd be a great country to do it.

Because you never know what happens, but I think it's going to be open and I think it's going to be free sailing.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 12:21]
🇺🇸🇮🇱🇱🇧🇱🇧⚡️ — President Trump on Lebanon:
We do want to see if we can straighten out the Lebanon thing, because it just seems to never end.

And that's a mini version of what we were doing. But it should not be tough. 

Hezbollah — we have to have a little talk with them.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 12:24]
🇭🇺⚡️ — Hungary’s parliament has approved a constitutional amendment imposing an eight-year term limit for prime ministers, effectively preventing former Prime Minister Viktor Orbán from returning to the position.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 12:30]
🇺🇸🇫🇷⚡️ — President Trump to Macron:
I called you very late last night to congratulate you. In the heavyweight division, a French fighter won. 

I don't know — maybe that's even more important than the World Cup. To some people, it might be.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 12:33]
🇸🇾🇮🇶⚡️ — An Iraqi oil tanker was attacked by armed gunmen on Saturday while traveling along the Aleppo–Manbij highway in northern Syria, causing material damage to the vehicle, according to Shafaq News.

Tribal and community leaders in Manbij condemned the attack, expressed solidarity with Iraq and the tanker driver, and stated that the assault “does not represent the people of Manbij or reflect the historical ties between the Syrian and Iraqi peoples.”

They also called for those responsible to be brought to justice and urged stronger security measures to protect trade and transportation routes between the two countries.

Neither Iraqi nor Syrian authorities have yet identified the attackers or their motives.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 12:56]
🇱🇧🇱🇧❌🇮🇱 — WATCH: Hezbollah released footage showing an FPV drone striking a lone IDF soldier as he tried to run away from it in Misgav Am, northern Israel, on May 29.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 12:57]
🇮🇱🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — A senior Israeli official told i24NEWS:
If we had known the war would end this way in terms of the "political habit" - it is not certain it would have been worth going to it.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 13:00]
🇮🇱🇮🇷🇺🇸⚡️ — Israeli Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu will hold a press conference at 21:00 local time (in an hour).

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 13:08]
🇹🇷🇺🇸🇮🇱🇮🇷⚡️ — Turkish President Erdoğan:
In the war that began on February 28 as a result of Israel's provocations, a very important step was taken last night.

It was announced that an agreement had been reached to end the fighting between the United States and Iran. 

As a result, our region, which had been on edge for months, breathed a sigh of relief.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 13:16]
🇹🇷🪖⚡️ — Turkish President Erdoğan on NATO:
Since the fall of the Fall of the Berlin Wall, none of the pessimistic predictions regarding the future of the alliance have come true. 

NATO has strengthened its position by adapting to changing conditions and asymmetric threats such as terrorism.

As Türkiye, we will continue to play a leading role within the alliance through our comprehensive military capabilities, our highly dynamic defense industry, our geographically strategic location, and our deep historical and cultural heritage.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 13:18]
🇹🇷🇺🇸🇮🇱🇮🇷⚡️ — Turkish President Erdoğan on Iran:
In this crisis, which brought not only our region but the entire world to the brink of disaster, praise be to God, not a single one of our citizens was harmed. 

The plans to set brother against brother did not succeed. Attempts to ignite new flames of discord among Turks, Arabs, Kurds, and Persians ended in failure.

We will never forget the innocent children who were murdered during the school break, the terrible destruction that took place in our region, and the unbridled undertaking of this war.

We hope that the agreement will open up the way to permanent peace and stability in our region.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 13:18]
🇹🇷🇺🇸🇮🇱🇮🇷⚡️ — Turkish President Erdoğan:
Since February 28, it has become very clear who genuinely wanted peace and who preferred the continuation of war.

Those who have pinned all their hopes on the persistence of gunfire in our region will undoubtedly be disturbed by the strengthening of a climate of peace. As they have done many times before, they will do everything in their power to obstruct this process.

We regard the statements made yesterday and today by the network of perpetrators responsible for the blood of innocent Palestinians and Lebanese as signs of this. 

Therefore, until the day the agreement is signed, it is essential to refrain from any rhetoric or actions that could escalate tensions and to remain extremely vigilant against acts of sabotage.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 13:19]
🇮🇱❌🇱🇧 — Sheer destruction along the road to the town of Hadatha in southern Lebanon caused by Israeli attacks.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 13:25]
🇺🇸🇮🇷🇴🇲⚡️ — A senior US administration official told reporters earlier today that Oman was “duplicitous” during negotiating efforts with Iran — so they “threw them out” of the mediation role.

“We were very unhappy with the job the Omanis did. We felt they were very duplicitous and almost like employees of the Iranians in the way that they maneuvered, so we kind of threw them out of this process,” the official said.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 13:28]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — The senior U.S. administration official said one of the key challenges in negotiations with Iran was establishing effective communication channels with Tehran’s leadership.

The official explained that the previous system involved Iran’s Supreme Leader directing the National Security Council through the political establishment and relaying messages via Oman. 

“We wanted to figure out what the new channels would be to communicate with, and obviously we decided on Pakistan and Qatar,” the official said.

They added that the traditional “political mechanism” was largely disrupted due to the initial attacks at the beginning of the war, as many officials were “hiding in bunkers” and several senior Iranian figures had been killed, making diplomatic communication more difficult.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 13:29]
🇮🇱🇺🇸⚡️ — Israeli Prime Minister Netanyahu during yesterday's cabinet meeting, per Channel 12:
We can stretch the rope with the Americans, but it must not be torn.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 14:02]
🇺🇸🇫🇷⚡️ — WATCH: President Trump and Brigitte Macron shake hands for about 13 seconds at the G7 summit.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 14:04]
🇮🇷🇺🇸⚡️ — Iranian President Masoud Pezeshkian:
What has been agreed upon is an important step toward stopping the war and beginning negotiations, and a final agreement has yet to take shape.  

The Islamic Republic of Iran has prepared itself for all options, and the government's focus—with or without an agreement—is sincere service to the people. 

The Iranian nation has learned from its martyred Imam not to submit to humiliation.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 14:07]
🇮🇱🇮🇷⚡️ — Israeli Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu:
The mission of my life is the struggle against Iran's nuclear program.

With an agreement or without an agreement, Iran will not have nuclear weapons. As long as I'm Prime Minister it will not happen.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 14:09]
🇮🇱🇮🇷⚡️ — Israeli Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu:
We set out on the largest strike sortie in the history of Israel. We crushed the nuclear facilities, destroyed their missiles, and most of their arsenal.

We have caused enormous damage to Iran's economy; some estimate it at one trillion dollars.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 14:13]
🇮🇱🇮🇷🇵🇸🇱🇧🇸🇾🇾🇪⚡️ — Israeli Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu:
The struggle is not over. We will have to continue standing guard and defending ourselves whenever necessary.

This goes not only against Iran; it is also against Iran's terrorist arms, which we also hit in an unprecedented way. We did it in Gaza; we did it in Lebanon, in Syria, and in Yemen; we did it in the refugee camps in Judea and Samaria; we did it everywhere.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 14:16]
🇮🇱🇮🇷🇵🇸🇱🇧🇸🇾⚡️ — Israeli Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu:
We will remain in the various "security zones" we have captured for as long as necessary in order to protect our country.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 14:18]
🇮🇱⚡️ — Israeli Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu:
We will continue to thwart threats in the region; we will build new alliances with the countries in the region and outside the region. 

We will guarantee our armed independence, and I am putting 350 billion shekels there for the defense budget. We will develop concepts that break the boundaries of imagination, and we will make Israel an even stronger power.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 14:20]
🇮🇱🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — Israeli Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu:
There are instances in which President Trump and I do not see eye to eye. 

One must stand up for Israel's security interests with wisdom and prudence.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 14:22]
🇮🇱🇮🇷🇵🇸⚡️ — Israeli Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu:
The Iranian terror axis is a shadow of what it was. There is more work to do. 

In Gaza we control over 60 percent of the territory of Gaza, and it no longer poses a real threat to Israel.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 14:25]
🇮🇱🇮🇷⚡️ — Israeli Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu:
I did not say that one of the objectives of the operation was to overthrow the Iranian regime.

I said to create the conditions that will help the Iranian people to overthrow the regime.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 14:28]
🇮🇱🇺🇸⚡️ — Israeli Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu:
In the United States, they say that President Trump does everything I ask, and in Israel, they say the opposite—that I do everything he asks. So that's not true, and that's not true. 

It's a relationship between partners who have known each other for a long time. 

Many times we agree; sometimes we also disagree. It happens in the best of families.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 14:35]
🇮🇱🇺🇸🇱🇧🇮🇷⚡️ — Israeli Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu:
We created a "security zone" in Lebanon, and we will remain in it as long as necessary.

Iran demanded that we withdraw from there; it didn't happen. Do you know why it didn't happen? Because I stood very, very firmly. 

I was very, very firm on this matter, and I think our American friends respect that firmness and persevered with that. We are staying there.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 14:37]
🇮🇱🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — Reporter: Why did Trump act like Biden and sign such an agreement?

Netanyahu: I wouldn't make that comparison. We still don't know what the agreement will be.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 14:41]
🇮🇱⚡️ — Israeli Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu:
Whoever tells you that we can do everything—that we can conquer half of Europe if we just decide to—that's not true.

And whoever tells you that we can completely disregard what the United States says—that's also not true.

We do take it into consideration, and we appreciate it as well.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 14:44]
🇮🇱🇮🇷⚡️ — Israeli Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu:
We saved the State of Israel from a threat of nuclear annihilation.

Because one must understand: Iran was racing toward nuclear weapons, and it was racing to bury its nuclear and missile industries deep underground.

We saved the State of Israel from destruction.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 14:54]
🇮🇱🇮🇷⚡️ — Israeli Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu:
Nobody knows when the Iranian regime will fall.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 14:55]
🇮🇱⚡️ — Israeli Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu on elections:
I am going to run, and I also intend to win.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 14:55]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — U.S. Strategic Petroleum Reserve inventories have fallen to 340.3 million barrels, the lowest level since 1983, after an 8.9 million-barrel drawdown — the third-largest withdrawal on record.

The reduction is part of a broader U.S. plan to release 172 million barrels from the emergency reserve to help stabilize global energy markets amid disruptions linked to the Iran War.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 15:00]
🇺🇦🇷🇺🇺🇸⚡️ — Ukrainian President Zelensky:
We offered Putin to meet anywhere, anywhere where real decisions to end the war could be made. He does not want it. 

We discussed with the U.S. And France the possibility of a meeting with Russia around the G7 with all democratic nations represented. Putin does not want it. 

Yesterday, we discussed with President Trump that such a meeting could be organized in the U.S. In a format where Putin would find it much harder to refuse at least to President Trump.

If Russia refuses this chance as well, additional pressure will be needed.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 15:11]
🇮🇱⚡️ — Israeli Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu requested to shorten his court testimony by approximately three hours tomorrow in order to attend a government meeting, but the court rejected the request, according to Israeli Channel 12.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 15:14]
🇮🇱⚡️ — Former Israeli Prime Minister Naftali Bennett:
On the military front, I will return to the security doctrine of fast, powerful, and decisive wars, instead of Netanyahu's strategy of dragging things out.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 15:15]
🇺🇸⚡️ — NEW: A U.S. Air Force B-52 Stratofortress crashed shortly after takeoff at Edwards Air Force Base at 11:20 AM.

➡️ Details of casualties have not been reported yet.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 15:24]
🇺🇸🇺🇸⚡️ — California Governor Gavin Newsom says the Trump administration’s Justice Department is investigating him and his wife.

➡️ He says President Trump is pursuing a political vendetta, arguing that officials are "trying to find a crime" despite no evidence of wrongdoing.

➡️ He noted that he is being targeted because he is considering a presidential run, calling him the "most corrupt president in American history."

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 15:55]
🇺🇸⚡️ — Scenes from the B-52 crash site at Edwards Air Force Base.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 16:02]
🇮🇱❌🇮🇷 — Former Israeli Prime Minister Naftali Bennett:
Against the Iranian axis of evil — we will fully renew the Octopus Doctrine that we began implementing in my government.

One hand prevents Iran from breaking through to nuclear capability, and the other accelerates the collapse of the regime through political, economic, technological and military means.

The countdown to regime change in Iran will begin the moment the government in Israel is replaced.

Soon the people of Israel will choose a new leadership — energetic, determined, and professional — that will restore security to Israel and care for you, Israeli citizens, wholeheartedly.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 16:17]
🇺🇸🇮🇷🇶🇦⚡️ — The U.S. secretly approved a financial arrangement between Qatar and Iran that allowed Doha to transfer funds to Tehran in exchange for ensuring freedom of navigation through the Strait of Hormuz and preventing attacks on Qatari vessels, according to Israel Hayom.

The arrangement, granted approximately one month ago, was aimed at stabilizing global energy markets and lowering oil prices, while also laying the groundwork for the broader U.S.-Iran memorandum of understanding. 

The deal allowed Iran access to funds held in Qatar, including payments presented as transit fees for tankers and a credit line worth up to $1 billion for purchasing goods.

The U.S. Navy maintained a public stance of enforcing maritime restrictions on Iran while quietly permitting the Qatari channel to operate. During Iranian Foreign Minister Abbas Araghchi’s visit to Doha, direct communications took place with U.S. envoys Steve Witkoff and Jared Kushner overseeing negotiations.

The arrangement became a point of controversy in Washington, contributing to a tougher U.S. negotiating position.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 16:26]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — U.S. officials told Axios that the full text of the memorandum of understanding will be released in the next 24–48 hours.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 16:45]
🇮🇷🇺🇸⚡️ — The U.S. naval blockade has effectively ended, with multiple Iranian vessels passing through the blockade zone without incident, according to Fars News Agency.

➡️ An Iranian VLCC oil tanker sailed from international waters towards Iranian ports after crossing the blockade area. A vessel carrying livestock feed also passed through the zone en route to Iran.

➡️ Additionally, a fully loaded Iranian oil tanker crossed the Sea of Oman and the former blockade line, continuing towards its export destination.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 16:48]
🇬🇧🇷🇺🧑‍⚖️ — British authorities have charged Indian national Ajay Pant, captain of the MV Smyrtos, with contravening sanctions. 24 members of the crew remain on board the ship, which is impounded in British waters.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 16:48]
🇧🇾🇺🇦⚡️ — Belarusian President Alexander Lukashenko:
Zelensky knows very well—let me stress this again—that from Belarus, and especially from my side, no military action should be expected.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 16:49]
🇧🇾🇮🇱🇵🇸⚡️ — Belarusian President Lukashenko on Israel:
What possible Holocaust, of which the Israelis speak, could justify the killing of so many people, above all women and children?

So many children have perished in Gaza. They have wiped everything off the face of the earth.

And now they speak of building some kind of resort on the bones of the dead. That is utter stupidity.

So Israel, too, needs to come to its senses, and reflect on its future existence.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 16:50]
🇧🇾🇺🇦⚡️ — Belarusian President Alexander Lukashenko:
We have said many times that it is absolutely unacceptable for the war between Ukraine and Russia to spill over onto the territory of Belarus.

Belarus is highly vulnerable militarily, and we recognize this reality, so we have no desire to engage in war.

Should Ukraine begin attacking Belarus in the same manner it attacks Russia, Belarus is laid out like an open book to the Ukrainian military. We fully understand that our key infrastructure—factories and logistics—would be hit hard.

Well, as they said, they already have 500 such targets planned in Belarus.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 16:52]
🇧🇾🇮🇱🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — Belarusian President Lukashenko on nuclear weapons:
If we approach the matter from the standpoint of fairness, does the United States of America possess nuclear weapons? Yes, it does.

Okay, the United States is the pioneer of nuclear weapons and has held them for a long time. But Israel remains quiet about the fact that it has nuclear weapons.

The Iranians could ask, “Why can’t we have nuclear weapons?” Especially when nearby India and Pakistan are nuclear powers. Why can’t Iran have nuclear weapons?

If we want fairness, let us gradually, step by step, eliminate all nuclear weapons in the world.

But if nuclear weapons are a deterrent, a guarantee that no one will ever attack you, then Iran has the right, like other nations, to possess nuclear weapons for its own defense.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 16:55]
🇧🇾🇮🇱🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — Belarusian President Lukashenko on Israel:
When Trump called out Netanyahu, he did succeed in pulling Israel back, which demonstrated Israel's complete dependence on the United States of America.

Donald Trump said plainly that if Netanyahu did not listen to him, Israel would be left to fend for itself.

That is what Israel fears most, because Israel is located relatively close to Iran, and Iran has every means to attack Israel.

And if the Israelis do not have American missiles, their so-called “golden”, all-weather dome will be pierced, and the Jewish people on their land will face something they neither want nor expect.

In this sense, the latest twists in the U.S.-Israel relationship reaffirm that Israel's dependence on America is complete.

That much has been obvious all along, with or without these events.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 17:05]
🇱🇧🇱🇧❌🇮🇱 — WATCH: Hezbollah FPV drones striking IDF equipment in southern Lebanon:

First video: FPV drone targets an IDF Namer APC on the southern outskirts of Zawtar al-Sharqiyah (June 3) 

Second video: FPV drone targets an IDF Merkava tank on the southern outskirts of Zawtar al-Sharqiyah (June 3)

Third video: FPV drone targets an IDF Namer APC in Khiam (June 9)

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 17:07]
🇮🇱❌🇱🇧🇱🇧 — The IDF says Hezbollah launched several attacks against Israeli troops in southern Lebanon today, including rockets, an anti-tank missile, and mortar fire.

➡️ According to the military, the rockets were intercepted by air defenses, and no warning sirens were activated in Israeli towns. The IDF said no injuries were reported.

➡️ The military also stated that Israeli forces identified several Hezbollah operatives approaching troops in vehicles in four separate incidents, describing them as "immediate threats." The Israeli Air Force carried out precision strikes against the individuals involved.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 17:11]
🏴❌🇸🇾 — Syria's Ministry of Interior says security personnel engaged two ISIS suicide bombers targeting one of their headquarters in Raqqa, killing one of them, while the second detonated an explosive vest after being surrounded.

➡️ The attack resulted in the death of one member of the internal security forces and wounded three others, who were transported to hospitals for treatment.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 17:18]
🇮🇱🤝🇸🇴 — Israeli Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu:
We are proud, and I am proud that my government is the first government on the planet to recognize Somaliland. Others will follow. 

And I think that these steps reflect a deep spiritual bond between our peoples. The Jewish people know what it means to possess an ancient history, a distinct identity, an unbreakable national spirit, yet still be denied recognition. 

And today Israel recognizes Somaliland and helps correct a historic injustice.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 17:22]
🇮🇱🤝🇸🇴 — Israeli Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu:
I think it's a friendship that is just getting closer and stronger all the time.

This is by way of expressing also our appreciation for the fact that you're opening an embassy in Jerusalem, our ancient capital. It is your parallel recognition — just as you expect nations to recognize your sovereignty, your identity, your own rights, and your own national rights. The same thing we have vis-à-vis our capital. 

It's only been the capital of the Jewish people since King David. That's only 3,000 years ago. So, for some countries, it's a belated recognition. For you, it was instant. And I very much welcome that.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 17:24]
🇸🇴🤝🇮🇱 — Somaliland's President Abdirahman Mohamed Abdullahi:
In Somaliland, everyone has a nickname. 

My nickname is "Irro," and I think you don't mind if I call you Mr. Bibi.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 17:27]
🇸🇴🤝🇮🇱 — Somaliland's President Abdirahman Mohamed Abdullahi:
Mr. Prime Minister, I also acknowledge your courage and clarity in engaging with Somaliland, where others were afraid. 

Your recognition of Somaliland as a peaceful, stable, and democratic society in a volatile region reflects its statesmanship and strategic foresight. 

For too long, the international community has misunderstood Somaliland's success and misread the prolonged failure of Somalia over the past 35 years. 

You have shown the courage to see reality as it is, not as it is often portrayed, and to recognize success where it exists. History will show the significance of this leadership.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 17:30]
🇸🇴🤝🇮🇱 — Somaliland's President Abdirahman Mohamed Abdullahi:
We have organized Israel as a nation defined by resilience, innovation, and strategic strength. 

Our two people share the experience of building stability under challenging conditions, and this form is a strong foundation for our partnership. 

The potential for cooperation between Somaliland and Israel is fast and practical.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 17:31]
🇸🇴🤝🇮🇱 — Somaliland's President Abdirahman Mohamed Abdullahi:
This relationship is not symbolic. It is strategic. It is based on realism, shared interests, and commitment to stability, development, and progress. 

It also sends a message that engagement should be guided by facts, outcomes, and potentiality.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 17:34]
🇮🇱🤝🇸🇴 — Israeli Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu:
Israel and Somaliland stand at the opposite sides of the Red Sea, but we are united by the same belief that freedom, democracy, and opportunity are stronger than extremism, terrorism, and chaos. 

The enemies of peace — and there are quite a few of them around us — build tunnels, missiles, and terror armies. 

We will build something stronger: partnerships, innovation, a future of hope and security.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 17:50]
🇮🇳⚡️ — India’s Defence Ministry announced the successful testing of several advanced defence technologies on June 10 and 11, including a multi-layered Ballistic Missile Defence (BMD) system and the maiden flight test of the Naval Anti-Ship Missile–Medium Range (NASM-MR).

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 17:51]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — The Trump administration is prepared to support the creation of a $300 billion investment fund for Iran as part of a final agreement to end the war, provided Tehran accepts a comprehensive settlement that includes a nuclear deal, according to FT.

A senior U.S. official said Washington had discussed potential sanctions relief alongside “a big $300bn fund to rebuild their country,” with all incentives tied to Iran’s “performance” in complying with the MoU expected to be formally signed in Switzerland on Friday.

The fund would only be established after a final settlement, following a 60-day extension of the ceasefire, the reopening of the Strait of Hormuz, and continued talks on Iran’s nuclear program.

The money would not come from governments but from private companies interested in investing in Iran’s economy, with potential interest from businesses in Europe, Asia—including South Korea and Japan—and the U.S. if sanctions are lifted. 

The structure and management of the proposed fund have not yet been finalized.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 18:09]
🇺🇸⚡️ — NEW: Eight crewmembers are believed to be dead in the B-52 bomber crash at Edwards Air Force Base, according to CNN.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 18:14]
🇺🇸⚡️ — Footage shows heavy flames and thick black smoke rising moments after the B-52 bomber crashed at Edwards Air Force Base.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 18:23]
🇮🇱❌🇱🇧 — WATCH: Footage shows the moment an Israeli drone dropped a grenade near PressTV journalist Hadi Hoteit in Kfar Tebnit, southern Lebanon, earlier today.

➡️ 6 shrapnel hits his body: 1 right chest, 3 right leg, 2 left leg. He is being treated at the hospital now.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 18:31]
🇬🇧🇺🇦⚡️ — British Prime Minister Keir Starmer announced that the UK will supply enriched uranium to Ukraine’s nuclear power stations.

➡️ The energy agreement will “power Ukraine for the next two years.” 

➡️ The deal includes £210 million ($483.7 million) in export financing, enabling UK-based Urenco to provide enriched uranium to Ukraine’s state nuclear operator Energoatom.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 18:40]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — CIA Director John Ratcliffe warned President Donald Trump and senior officials that U.S. intelligence raised serious doubts about Iran’s willingness to accept the nuclear concessions Washington is seeking in a final agreement, Axios reports.

➡️ Ratcliffe was joined by Marco Rubio and Pete Hegseth in expressing concerns about the deal, while Vice President JD Vance and U.S. envoys Steve Witkoff and Jared Kushner supported moving forward with the agreement.

➡️ The concerns stemmed from intelligence suggesting that Iranian officials’ private discussions about the deal differed from the commitments they were presenting to mediators and the United States. One source said the intelligence indicated “Iranian intentions are not in line with their commitments under the deal.”

➡️ The White House said Trump considered differing views from his advisers but remained the final decision-maker. A U.S. official argued that the memorandum of understanding meets the administration’s key conditions by preventing Iran from obtaining a nuclear weapon, requiring it to give up highly enriched uranium, and ensuring it cannot threaten global energy supplies.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 18:43]
🇮🇷🇺🇸🇴🇲⚡️ — The MoU states that Iran will use its “best efforts” to ensure the safe passage of commercial vessels through the Strait of Hormuz without imposing any charges for the 60-day period, Axios reports.

➡️ In return, the U.S. will gradually ease its naval blockade, with the restrictions set to be fully removed within 30 days.

➡️ The agreement also states that Iran will hold talks with Oman to establish a framework for the future administration and maritime services of the strait, with participation from other Gulf states to reach an arrangement consistent with international law and the sovereign rights of regional countries.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 18:45]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — The US-Iran MoU says any final deal will include a "definitive and mutually agreed-upon plan" for the establishment of a $300 billion fund for the "reconstruction and economic development" of Iran and a mechanism for its implementation, Axios reports.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 18:55]
🇩🇰🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — Reporter: What has the U.S. actually gained from this agreement and is the Middle East in a better place now than it was before February?

Danish FM Løkke: The region is at least a better place than it was yesterday, but as I have also said earlier during this process, the big question is how much it has changed compared to the day before this war broke out,

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 18:59]
🇩🇰🇪🇺🇮🇱🇵🇸⚡️ — Danish Foreign Minister Lars Løkke Rasmussen:
Denmark has for a long time called for EU sanctions on Ben-Gvir and Smotrich but also to take action against exports from the illegal settlements in the West Bank.

I sense that there is also some momentum for this in Europe. Unfortunately, I am quite sure that we don't have a majority for that yet.

But the Danish government is working towards that.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 19:38]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — President Trump via Truth Social:
Iran has agreed to never have a Nuclear Weapon! 

Also, the story that the U.S. is paying Iran 300 million Dollars is Fake News, put out by the Dumocrats!!

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 20:05]
🇮🇱❌🇮🇷 — Former Israeli Prime Minister Naftali Bennett:
In Israel, there'll be a new government, and hopefully I'll lead that new government. 

I want to tell the Iranian regime from here: I'm going to be your worst nightmare ever. I won't relent until we free your people and ensure you don't have a nuclear weapon. So you've got no hope. 

We won't let up on this effort because it's fighting for our freedom, for our security, and for the benefit of the entire Middle East.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 20:10]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — Vice President JD Vance on the Iran deal:
What this deal means is that the Straits of Hormuz are open immediately. You're already seeing oil and gas prices come down just over the past 24 hours. 

Number two, it ensures that Iran will never have a nuclear weapon. We have to back up for a second and appreciate that what the president has done has completely decimated Iran's nuclear program. 

Now, this deal really has two pathways. On the one hand, if the Iranians make the long-term commitments never to rebuild, then they're going to be welcomed into the world economy. 

If, on the other hand, they try to rebuild that nuclear program, they're never going to have the resources in order to do so. So it's a win-win for the American people. We ensure Iran doesn't have a nuclear weapon either way. And now it's really up to the Iranians. 

Over the next few months, we're going to see if they're serious about dismantling that program for the long term. If they do, President Trump has said, "We want their country to be successful." 

But what we know is that our country is successful thanks to great presidential leadership and a lot of good decisions.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 20:29]
🇩🇰🇮🇱⚡️ — Q: What woman do you look up to?

Danish PM Frederiksen: Golda Meir, who was the first female prime minister in Israel. She is obviously a role model.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 20:38]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — Vice President JD Vance on the Iran deal:
One of the core parts of the agreement is that the IAEA and the United States are going to help Iran destroy the highly enriched stockpile, and that's something that's spelled out very clearly in the MoU.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 20:40]
🇺🇸🇺🇸⚡️ — Acting Attorney General Todd Blanche stayed silent as CNN's Manu Raju asked if the DOJ is investigating Gov. Gavin Newsom.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 20:45]
🇨🇳🇵🇭⚡️ — During a maritime domain awareness patrol over the disputed Scarborough Shoal on Monday, Philippine authorities observed a Chinese research vessel towing a movable floating platform out of and back into the disputed shoal.

➡️ The Chinese research vessel Yue Zhan Yu Ke 6, assisted by a service boat, was seen towing the platform through the southeast entrance of the shoal, while another Chinese research vessel remained nearby.

➡️ The aerial patrol conducted by the Bureau of Fisheries and Aquatic Resources confirmed that two Chinese research vessels and the floating platform continue to operate inside Bajo de Masinloc.

➡️ The platform, first detected by the Philippine Coast Guard on May 25, remains inside the lagoon. It is estimated to measure five to seven meters in length with a deck area of around 30 square meters and is surrounded by protective fenders.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 20:55]
🇵🇭🇨🇳⚡️ — Philippine Coast Guard Spox for the West Philippine Sea:
Anything that undermines our sovereignty and sovereign rights is always a concern of the national government.

The approach of the national government is always on diplomatic action. We still have strong faith in the diplomatic and legal action.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 21:04]
🇾🇪🇦🇪⚡️ — Intelligence from Yemen’s internationally recognized government shows that weapons stockpiles left behind by the UAE during its withdrawal from Yemen were looted, with some of the equipment eventually ending up in the hands of Al-Qaeda in the Arabian Peninsula, according to Intelligence Online.

➡️ The abandoned caches, located primarily in Yemen’s Hadramawt Governorate, included reconnaissance drones, loitering munitions, fiber-optic guidance components, infrared-guided missiles, mortar rounds, anti-aircraft guns, heavy machine guns, and various small arms. 

➡️ The UAE had maintained a major military presence in the region, including at Al-Rayyan Airport, before withdrawing its forces in late December and early January. Yemeni security forces have recovered some of the missing weapons, but significant quantities were smuggled out of Hadramawt, with portions sold to AQAP.

➡️ Intelligence officials warn that Al Qaeda is attempting to reactivate dormant cells in the region. The group remains active in parts of southern Yemen, including Abyan and Shabwa, while its main stronghold is believed to be in the Abidah Valley in Marib Governorate.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 21:06]
🇮🇷🇳🇿⚽️ — The FIFA 2026 World Cup Group G clash between Iran and New Zealand is underway at Los Angeles Stadium in California.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 21:13]
🇮🇷🇳🇿⚽️ — New Zealand's Elijah Just scored the first goal against Iran just seven minutes into the match.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 21:20]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — Fox's Hannity: Will Iran ever get a taxpayer dollar?

VP JD Vance: They never get a dime of American taxpayer money ever. There's a lot of economic benefit in the United States relieving a lot of sanctions and welcoming them back into the world economy.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 21:22]
🇺🇸🇶🇦🇮🇷⚡️ — Fox's Hannity: There’s a report that the Qataris are giving them $300 billion with the approval of the US. Did the U.S. ever sign off on the Qatari paying them that money?

VP JD Vance: No, the agreement says they are not getting a single dime of American money; that is just not what this is. If the Iranians behave, we would invite other countries, not us, to invest in their country.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 21:23]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — Fox's Hannity: A lot of people are questioning why not release the memorandum of understanding?

VP JD Vance: There are some diplomatic protocols; there is some sequencing that the Pakistanis have been involved in this, the Qataris have been involved, and what President Trump has said is the agreement will come out on Friday, he may decide to release the agreement sooner than that.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 21:26]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — Vice President JD Vance on the Iran deal:
They're agreeing right now to eliminate the enriched stockpile, and if they don't get to a point where they agree to stop enriching, then they don't get the other benefits of the bargain. 

A lot of the technical details we will figure out over the next month or two.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 21:28]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — Fox's Hannity: Let's talk about any place, anywhere, any time U.S. Inspectors? That's part of the deal?

VP JD Vance: Absolutely something we are negotiating over. That is one of the final details that’s going to be figured out here.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 21:30]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — Vice President JD Vance on Obama comparing Trump's deal to the JCPOA:
I would say Obama. why in the world—if it's the same thing—is it that the Gulf Arabs hated your deal and they love our deal? 

He should acknowledge that the people who are closest to this love the Trump deal. They hate the Obama deal. And that is maybe the biggest endorsement of this plan.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 21:32]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — VP JD Vance: We have the cards; if they don't honor the commitment, we will figure out what to do when we get there.

Fox's Hannity: That means go back and resume bombing?

Vance: It could. It could mean a lot of things. He doesn't want to do those things. He wants Iran to be a normal country; they've got to act like it.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 21:34]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — Vice President JD Vance:
People always ask me, "How do you make sure that the Iran war does not become a quagmire?" 

And I always say, the way you prevent that is you do what Donald Trump is doing: you set clear objectives, you accomplish those objectives, and then you reevaluate whether you want new objectives or whether you have accomplished what you need to accomplish.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 21:38]
🇮🇷🇳🇿⚽️ — Iran's Ramin Rezaeian equalizes to 1-1 against New Zealand in the 32nd minute.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 21:43]
🇺🇸⚡️ — Vice President JD Vance:
What's interesting about President Trump is that he doesn't wear it on his sleeve, but he is a person of faith. 

He thinks about these very deep questions: Where did we come from? Where are we going?

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 21:46]
🇺🇸⚡️ — Vice President JD Vance on Trump:
Everybody didn't understand how this New York billionaire could have such connection to Christian conservatives in the heartland, and I think if you know the Christian conservatives and you know the president, it's not all that bizarre. 

They are the most welcoming people in the world. They don't judge you based on superficial characteristics, they care about what is on the inside. 

That is one of the great lessons and examples of Christianity.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 21:53]
🇺🇸⚡️ — A new Reuters/Ipsos poll found President Trump’s approval rating rose slightly to 36%, as public dissatisfaction over the cost of living showed signs of easing following the announcement of a MoU with Iran.

Approval of Trump’s handling of living costs increased to 24%, up from 22% a week earlier and 20% a month earlier, while disapproval fell to 69% from 73%. 

The poll was conducted before and after Trump announced an agreement with Iran, which contributed to falling gasoline prices, though fuel costs remain about $1 per gallon higher than before the U.S. and Israel launched strikes on Iran in February.

Despite the improvement, Trump’s overall approval remains near the lowest point of his political career and far below the 47% rating he held at the start of his second term in January 2025.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 22:09]
🇺🇸⚡️ — Senior White House officials believe NYT reporters Maggie Haberman and Jonathan Swan have obtained audio recordings of Situation Room meetings for their upcoming book Regime Change, raising concerns over a potential security breach, Axios reports.

Officials are alarmed by the book’s detailed, verbatim accounts of high-level discussions on issues including the Iran War and the Epstein files, with one administration source saying, “We’re afraid some of our most sensitive conversations were being recorded.”

However, there is no evidence that recordings were actually used, and the journalists have historically reconstructed detailed conversations through interviews with participants. Haberman and Swan, who conducted more than 1,000 interviews for the book, declined to comment.

The White House has not disputed the authenticity of the reported conversations, and President Trump is "furious" by the detailed accounts of private Situation Room discussions.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 22:19]
🇻🇪🇺🇸⚡️ — Venezuela’s government and the local branch of U.S. conglomerate General Electric signed a memorandum of understanding to strengthen the country’s electricity sector.

➡️ Interim President Delcy Rodríguez said the agreement aims to deliver 1 gigawatt of power capacity within the first two years and more than 5 gigawatts over four years, calling it “a historic step for Venezuela” to restore its electricity supply.

➡️ The cost of the deal was not disclosed.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 22:23]
🇮🇷🇳🇿⚽️ — Elijah Just scored his second goal against Iran, bringing New Zealand ahead 2-1 in the 54th minute.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 22:30]
🇨🇳⚡️ — China’s economic imbalances widened in May as weak domestic demand contrasted with a surge in exports amid the fallout from the Iran War, according to SCMP.

Retail sales fell 0.6% year-on-year in May—the first decline since China ended its COVID-19 lockdowns in late 2022—after a 0.2% increase in April, missing forecasts despite a boost from the Labour Day holiday. Industrial output rose 4.5%, up from 4.1% in April but below March’s 5.7%, as factories relied on strong exports to offset weaker domestic demand.

Fixed-asset investment fell 4.1% in the January–May period, worsening from a 1.6% decline in the first four months. The property sector remained a major drag, with real estate investment dropping 16.2% and new home sales by floor area falling 10.8%.

China’s exports rose 19.4% year-on-year in May while imports climbed 27.4%, highlighting the growing importance of foreign demand. Consumers remain cautious, with stronger demand for essential goods but weaker discretionary spending, while sectors such as electric vehicles, semiconductors, and industrial robots continued to record strong growth.

China’s urban unemployment rate eased to 5.1% in May from 5.2% in April and 5.4% in March.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 22:32]
🇮🇷🇳🇿⚽️ — Iran's Mohammad Mohebi equalizes to 2-2 against New Zealand in the 64th minute.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 22:43]
🇮🇷🇺🇸⚡️ — Iranian officials told Drop Site News that Tehran added two senior psychologists to its negotiation advisory team to analyze President Trump’s communication style and help craft messages delivered through regional mediators.

According to the Iranian account, the advisers developed a psychological profile of Trump, whom they described as displaying an erratic or “psychopathic behavior pattern,” and adjusted their messaging accordingly. 

An Iranian official claimed Trump’s responses improved after their recommendations were incorporated, describing the negotiation process as increasingly “clinical” in nature.

The psychologists joined the advisory circle after indirect talks began in Islamabad in April, as Iran and the U.S. exchanged proposals for a memorandum of understanding.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 22:49]
🇺🇸⚡️ — The Justice Department’s leadership closed its investigation into Paramount’s acquisition of Warner Bros. Discovery before career antitrust lawyers completed their review, WSJ reports.

➡️ Some staff investigators were leaning toward recommending a lawsuit, arguing the merger could reduce competition and violate antitrust laws.

➡️ However, senior officials decided to clear the deal after believing Paramount CEO David Ellison had adequately addressed concerns during a two-hour interview, including questions about the merged company’s ability to maintain 30 theatrical releases annually despite its debt.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 22:57]
🇨🇳🇲🇲⚡️ — Chinese President Xi Jinping meets with Myanmar's President Min Aung Hlaing in Beijing.

➡️ Chinese schoolchildren, waving Chinese and Myanmar flags, gave Min Aung Hlaing a warm welcome.

➡️ The two leaders are now holding bilateral talks.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 23:06]
🇮🇷🇳🇿⚽️ — The FIFA 2026 World Cup Group G clash between Iran and New Zealand ended with the score 2-2.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 23:08]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — Vice President JD Vance on Iran:
The coolest thing about the progress we’ve made over the last few weeks is that you’re seeing people within the Iranian system—senior leadership, even IRGC officials—say, “You know what? We may have some animosity and mistrust, but we recognize the way that we’ve done business with the US for 47 years is a mistake. Let’s try something else.”

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 23:49]
🇸🇪🇬🇧⚡️ — Sweden has chosen Rolls-Royce SMR to build three small modular reactors under the Videberg Project, adding 1,500 MW of nuclear capacity—about 6% of the country’s annual electricity demand, Reuters reports.

➡️ The project will be Sweden’s first new nuclear power development in more than 40 years, with the first reactor expected to become operational in the mid-2030s. 

➡️ The deal, worth several billion pounds, is seen as a major step toward strengthening Sweden’s energy security and meeting its 2045 net-zero goals.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 23:51]
🇮🇱🇺🇸⚡️ — Israeli National Security Minister Ben-Gvir has canceled a planned family trip to the U.S. after encountering difficulties obtaining a U.S. visa, according to Haaretz.

➡️ Ben-Gvir had planned to travel to Miami to attend the wedding of an Israeli businessman’s daughter, but the trip was ultimately canceled following the visa issues.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [15.06.2026 23:59]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — Trump says the Strait of Hormuz has reopened following the US-Iran agreement — but across the shipping industry, confidence remains scarce, CNN reports.

Threats including mines, drones, and missile attacks continue to deter movement, while crew exhaustion after months of uncertainty adds further operational risk.

Kpler ship-tracking data shows no meaningful movement among the 220 tankers and nearly 500 vessels currently anchored in the Persian Gulf.

Caravel Group CEO Angad Banga says his vessels are ready to move but holding position: “We are maintaining enhanced manning and citadel readiness until we have 30 days of incident-free transits. Not three days. Thirty.”

“After so many false starts, the shipping industry is going to be cautious” — Tim Huxley, chairman of Mandarin Shipping, adding that trade flows and damaged Middle East infrastructure will take considerable time to recover.​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 00:04]
🇨🇳🇺🇸⚡️ — A suspected China-linked hacking group spent more than a year covertly stealing data from U.S. and Canadian academic, medical, and military research institutions before being detected, according to Google.

Google’s Threat Intelligence Group said the campaign, attributed to a group known as UNC6508, ran from September 2023 to November 2025 and targeted information related to defense intelligence, Indo-Pacific military strategy, artificial intelligence, unmanned systems, cyber warfare programs, and medical research.

The hackers exploited vulnerabilities in REDCap servers, stole legitimate login credentials, and set up automated systems to forward emails containing selected keywords to accounts under their control. 

Google said it identified multiple compromised organizations in the U.S. and Canada and notified those affected.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 00:08]
🇮🇷🇺🇸🇮🇱⚡️ — IRGC Quds Force commander Brigadier General Esmail Qaani tells Iranian state media the war has “completely discredited America” and accelerated the “collapse” of the Israeli regime.

Qaani says not a single resistance group abandoned the field despite unprecedented pressure, adding their steadfastness has “terrified the enemies.”

Regional groups independently decided to defend Iran without being asked — “without anyone even asking them a single word,” he said.

“Hezbollah cannot be dismantled” — Qaani warns everything seen from Hezbollah so far is “only the tip of the iceberg.”

Describes Bab al-Mandab Strait as a strategic asset “like wax in the hands” of Hezbollah, Ansarullah, and Yemeni forces, claiming advanced US warships “did not dare to pass through.”

Praises Iran’s negotiators, saying steadfastness on Lebanon proved “the men of the battlefield and diplomacy are of the resistance kind.“​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 00:10]
🇨🇳⚡️ — Chinese universities are overhauling their academic offerings to better align higher education with national development priorities, cutting thousands of programs deemed outdated and replacing them with new technology-focused degrees, SCMP reports.

Between 2021 and 2025, universities revoked or suspended 12,200 undergraduate programs and introduced 10,200 new ones, meaning more than 30% of degree programs were adjusted. 

The reductions were concentrated in arts, humanities, foreign languages, and management, while new programs increasingly focus on fields tied to Beijing’s economic goals, including AI and embodied intelligence.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 00:15]
🇺🇸⚡️ — OpenAI spent about $34bn in 2025 as it ramped up spending in the AI race ahead of a planned IPO, including roughly $19bn on R&D and nearly $6bn on sales, marketing, and other costs, FT reports.

The company generated about $13bn in revenue, but costs still far exceeded income.

Reported losses rose to around $39bn from $5bn in 2024, though most of the increase was due to a roughly $30bn non-cash accounting charge tied to earlier investor instruments. Excluding that and other non-cash items (including stock-based compensation and Microsoft computing credits), underlying losses were about $8bn.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 00:23]
🇺🇸🇷🇺🇮🇷⚡️ — U.S. Coast Guard cyber teams have found that “dark fleet” tankers carrying sanctioned Russian and Iranian oil rely on insecure digital systems that could be exploited to cause accidents, oil spills, or explosions, according to WSJ.

The ships often use high-bandwidth internet, remote access tools like AnyDesk and TeamViewer, and even pirated, malware-infected software to manage navigation and operations. In some cases, owners were able to remotely access or even attempt to delete onboard data during U.S. boarding operations.

Investigators also found deception tactics including multiple AIS transponders, switches to change vessel identities, fake GPS data, and reused names from scrapped ships to mask movements. Some vessels were tracked broadcasting false locations while actually operating elsewhere.

Officials say the findings suggest these ships are deliberately configured for illicit trade rather than normal commercial use, raising serious safety and environmental risks due to the potential for fires, explosions, or oil spills involving millions of gallons of crude.

Coast Guard officials hope that other countries will be encouraged to step up efforts to interdict them.  

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 00:27]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — Shipowners are expected to delay resuming transit through the Strait of Hormuz for weeks until the U.S.-Iran deal is seen as real “material” and fully implemented, according to Mitsui OSK Lines CEO Jotaro Tamura.

He told FT: “What will have to come in place is not just a simple agreement… but it has to be material and translated into the real situations in the Strait of Hormuz.”

Tamura added it could take “at least a couple of weeks or if not a month” for confidence to return, noting that previous false starts have made operators cautious.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 04:09]
🇺🇦❌🇷🇺 — Ukrainian drones attacked the Moscow Refinery in Kapotnya, Russia, early this morning, causing a massive fire at the facility.

➡️ At least 60 drones have been intercepted in the Moscow region over the past few hours.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 04:17]
🇺🇦❌🇷🇺 — Footage shows the moment a Ukrainian FP-1 drone struck Moscow Refinery this morning.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 04:19]
🇺🇸🇺🇦🇫🇷⚡️ — Trump, Zelensky, and Macron arrived together for the G7 meeting.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 06:36]
🇺🇸🇶🇦⚡️ — President Trump with the Emir of Qatar:
The Emir is a fantastic man, respected all over the world.

Prime Minister likewise, but we have to go with the Emir first.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 06:37]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — President Trump on Iran:
We have our deal done with Iran. It should be successful.

It goes to a second stage, which I think will be easier.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 06:38]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — President Trump on Iran:
We are not investing any money in Iran, by the way. A rumor got out there yesterday. It was ridiculous. 

We have the right to go in someday and do if I want to do something or somebody wants to do something, but we are not investing any money. 

We have no obligation to invest any money in Iran.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 06:39]
🇺🇸🇶🇦🇮🇷⚡️ — President Trump claims Qatar and Iran share a land border and that "you can walk right across the border."

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 06:40]
🇺🇸🇶🇦🇮🇷⚡️ — President Trump to the Emir of Qatar on Iran:
You fought, and you helped us with great bravery.

You will always be my friend.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 06:41]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — President Trump on Iran:
I never cared about regime change, but I guess you have regime change in Iran.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 06:41]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — President Trump on Iran:
I don't believe in regime change. I've watched regime changes for years, and they never work.

It has to just happen.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 06:43]
🇺🇸🇺🇦🇷🇺⚡️ — President Trump after meeting with Zelensky:
Russia should make a deal. Russia has lost a tremendous amount of people; so has Ukraine.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 06:45]
🇺🇸🇸🇾⚡️ — President Trump on Syria:
I was very responsible for Syria, and the man that's running Syria now is a person that I put there, along with President Erdoğan and some others. 

He's not a Boy Scout, but he's done an amazing job of pulling it together.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 06:47]
🇺🇸🇸🇾🇮🇱🇱🇧⚡️ — President Trump on Lebanon:
Israel has been fighting Hezbollah for too long, and too many people are being killed. 

You don't have to knock down an apartment house every time you're looking for somebody, because there are a lot of people in those apartment houses. And they're not all Hezbollah, that I can tell you. 

I suggested to Israel to let Syria take care of Hezbollah because, to be honest with you, I think they'd do a better job of doing it.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 06:48]
🇺🇸🇸🇾🇮🇱🇱🇧⚡️ — President Trump on Lebanon:
Al-Sharaa been very good for me. He's protected everything that I've asked for. 

If Israel can't do the job without killing everyone else, he'll do the job. Syria will do the job.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 06:51]
🇺🇸🇮🇱🇱🇧⚡️ — President Trump:
I am not frustrated with Netanyahu. We have a great relationship.

Bibi ends up doing a very—I saw that attack [on the Dahieh]. I saw where that bomb went. Did you see what happened? That was a vicious, that was too much.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 06:52]
🇺🇸🇮🇱🇱🇧⚡️ — President Trump:
Without the United States, there would be no Israel.

Bibi has to be more responsible with respect to Lebanon.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 06:53]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — President Trump on Iran:
In my deal, if Iran gets a nuclear weapon, they get blown up.

In Obama's deal, they were allowed to have a nuclear weapon.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 06:54]
🇺🇸🇮🇱🇮🇷⚡️ — President Trump on Iran:
Netanyahu came to Washington and begged—he begged Obama not to make that deal with Iran.

Obama was on the side of Iran, not Israel, and he made the deal.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 06:55]
🇺🇸🇹🇷🇮🇷⚡️ — President Trump on Iran:
Iran would even hit Türkiye once. I never understood it. Nobody is going to understand it.

That's the problem. They are totally irrational people, and those people are now gone.

I think Iran has rational leadership now.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 06:56]
🇺🇸🇮🇱🇮🇷⚡️ — President Trump:
If it weren't for the United States of America, Israel would not exist right now. Israel would have been blown off the face of the Earth, 100%.

Every smart person in Israel knows that.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 06:58]
🇺🇸🇺🇦🇷🇺⚡️ — President Trump:
Obama gave Ukraine $350 billion worth of weapons.

He gave, which was crazy.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 06:59]
🇺🇸🇺🇦🇷🇺⚡️ — President Trump on Ukraine:
This has no impact on us other than that we sell weapons.

We are thousands of miles away.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 07:01]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — Reporter: If the Iranian regime continues to kill their own people, will you still go ahead with this deal?

Trump: We talked to them about it. The majority of that took place during the first and second regimes, much more so than now.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 07:04]
🇺🇸🇺🇦🇫🇷⚡️ — President Trump and President Zelensky spoke briefly at the G7 summit.

➡️ They will have a meeting on the sidelines of the summit later today.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 07:07]
🇫🇷🇺🇦⚡️ — A hot mic moment at the G7 captured French President Emmanuel Macron urging Ukrainian President Zelensky to remain longer at the summit.

Zelensky replied that he needed to return to Brussels. Macron then asked whether he had arranged a one-on-one meeting with President Trump, to which Zelensky appeared to answer no. Later, Trump announced an impromptu bilateral meeting with Zelensky. 

After realizing their conversation was being picked up by microphones, both lowered their voices.

Macron was also overheard separately describing his own meeting with Trump as “difficult.”

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 07:09]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — President Trump is considering dismissing several senior officials who opposed the Iran deal, including Secretary of War Pete Hegseth and CIA Director John Ratcliffe, according to Israel Hayom.

A senior U.S. official was quoted as saying, “The argument has been settled. Those who opposed it may pay a personal price.”

Secretary of State Marco Rubio is not currently believed to be at risk because he has been careful not to publicly criticize the agreement.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 07:14]
🇺🇸⚡️ — NEW: The FBI and its law enforcement partners said they disrupted an alleged plot targeting the UFC Freedom 250 event held on the White House South Lawn during President Donald Trump’s 80th birthday weekend.

Five suspects have been arrested, and at least 23 individuals were identified as part of a potential network. 

Investigators say the plan involved using explosive-filled drones to strike buildings near the event, trigger a mass evacuation, funnel crowds toward a pre-positioned sniper team, and later launch a “second wave” attack aimed at storming the White House gates.

The FBI learned of the alleged threat on June 10 and secured an arrest in Cincinnati. Investigators later found Signal chats involving 23 users discussing preparations for the attack, with some planning to travel to Fredericksburg, Virginia, ahead of the event to prepare for the attack.

One suspect said the intended targets were “capitalist elites,” billionaires, and politicians who had received donations from AIPAC. The investigation involved at least 12 FBI field offices.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 07:17]
🇮🇷🇺🇸⚡️ — The U.S. naval blockade on Iranian ports has been lifted, but ships still have to coordinate with the IRGC Navy when transiting the Strait of Hormuz, according to Iran's IRIB.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 07:20]
🇩🇪🇺🇸⚡️ — Germany's Chancellor Friedrich Merz gave President Trump a custom German national football team jersey bearing the name "TRUMP" with the number 47 on the back.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 07:31]
🇮🇱🧑‍⚖️ — Israeli Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu clashed with prosecutor Yonatan Tadmor during cross-examination in Case 2000, pounding the table and shouting, “Police state! Stasi! Political persecution!” after being challenged over contradictions in his testimony regarding discussions with Yedioth Ahronoth editor-in-chief Arnon Mozes, according to Kan News.

Netanyahu accused investigators of using spyware as part of “a campaign to overthrow a prime minister.” He said, "You did what you have never done to any public figure and used spyware; that's what you did in a campaign to overthrow a prime minister... You violated all the laws."

Judge Rivka Friedman-Feldman repeatedly attempted to calm him, but he continued criticizing the proceedings, saying, “You will spend all your days in court! What public figure did you do this to? This is shameful. Everyone says this is a police state! Stasi! Political persecution!”

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 08:07]
🇮🇱🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — Washington is preparing to withdraw approximately 20% of the refueling aircraft stationed at Israel’s Ben Gurion Airport following the US-Iran MoU, Channel 12 reports.

72 US military refueling aircraft currently occupy significant space at Ben Gurion, causing congestion and threatening mass flight cancellations affecting over 2 million passengers this summer.

Israeli Transportation Minister Miri Regev demanded immediate removal, warning Netanyahu that if half the planes are not gone by Tuesday, more than 2 million citizens will face cancelled flights including Rosh Hashanah travel to Uman.

Withdrawn aircraft may be relocated to Europe but kept on standby to redeploy to Israel if war resumes — Channel 12 did not confirm whether planes would leave Israel entirely or move to Israeli Air Force bases.

Israel’s Civil Aviation Authority head warned in May that turning Ben Gurion into a “US military base with limited commercial operations” threatens Israeli airlines’ economic stability and the return of foreign carriers.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 08:10]
🇮🇷🇺🇸🇮🇱🇱🇧⚡️ — Iran’s Foreign Minister Abbas Araghchi:
Any military attack by the Zionist regime against Lebanon, and the continuation of the occupation, constitutes a violation of the Memorandum of Understanding.

Without the withdrawal of Israeli forces from the territories they occupied in this war, the war will not fully end.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 08:11]
🇪🇺🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — European Commission President Ursula von der Leyen:
I congratulated President Trump on his agreement with Iran.

We both agree that it should mean a definitive end to Iran's nuclear programme.

The Strait will reopen. Oil prices are falling.   

And that's how diplomacy delivers.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 08:20]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — A Reuters investigation found that the U.S. military quietly oversaw a large offshore ship-to-ship oil transfer network since early May to keep Gulf energy exports flowing despite Iran’s disruption of shipping through the Strait of Hormuz.

More than 90 ships have participated, transferring an estimated 90 million barrels of oil and petroleum products at sites near Fujairah in the UAE and Sohar in Oman. The operation used techniques similar to Iran’s sanctions-evasion methods, including ships traveling with AIS transponders turned off, dimmed lights, and tightly controlled convoy movements monitored by drones, helicopters, and surveillance assets.

Tankers carried oil through the Strait before transferring cargo to waiting VLCCs, with each transfer taking 24–40 hours. U.S. military support included aerial monitoring, security oversight, and compliance screening.

Major Gulf exporters, including the UAE’s ADNOC and Kuwait Oil Tanker Company, were among the participants.

An Apache helicopter shot down by Iran on June 9 was reportedly involved in the broader mission, though its exact role remains unclear. The operation involved companies approved through a U.S. Navy review process in Bahrain, requiring disclosure of ownership, cargo details, and tracking histories.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 08:29]
🇺🇸🇦🇪⚡️ — President Trump on UAE President MbZ:
His Highness is a warrior. He was in there fighting, and he does what has to be done. And he's known for it. He's a courageous man. 

He's got a great country. It's a fantastic country. And they've been with the United States for a long time. But I would say much more so since I came on board.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 08:31]
🇺🇸🇦🇪🇮🇷⚡️ — President Trump with UAE President MbZ:
I just want to say that the relationship has been outstanding. He's a man of great respect. Everybody respects him, and they respect your country. 

We just signed a deal with Iran. And this country was a very powerful ally. And good things are happening.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 08:32]
🇦🇪🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — UAE President MbZ to Trump:
It is my pleasure, Mr. President, to be with you here. And I want to say that we are so grateful to have you here and as a President of the United States. 

A special thank you for your support during the Six-Week War. It means a lot to us.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 08:33]
🇺🇸🇦🇪⚡️ — President Trump on UAE President MbZ:
When you're that rich, you can speak that lowly. I was just wondering, can anybody hear that?

When you're so rich, you have such confidence that you don't have to do any strain to the voice. He's great.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 08:36]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — President Trump on Iran:
The relationship has now normalized.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 08:37]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — President Trump on Iran:
The Strait of Hormuz will be open and toll-free — permanently toll-free.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 08:39]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — President Trump on the Iran deal:
Lindsey Graham is skeptical? I have to talk to him. He will be in big trouble.

Lindsey is good. He is fine. He is not skeptical.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 08:40]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — President Trump on the Iran deal:
This agreement is about one thing: that Iran will never have a nuclear weapon. Never, ever, ever. 

The rest of it is irrelevant, frankly.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 08:43]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — Reporter: Senator Graham also said that an eventual agreement with Iran should be sent to Congress for review. Would you do that? 

Trump: I never thought of it, but I would. I wouldn't mind. I mean, you know, the Democrats — we call them "Dumbocrats" because they're dumb people. 

Well, what I'd like to do is send it to Congress saying, "You shouldn't approve it," and I'll get it approved. Whatever I say, they want to do the opposite. It's not working too well for him, by the way.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 08:45]
🇺🇸🇦🇪⚡️ — Reporter: Mr. President, were you briefed on the attack plans for the UFC event in the White House? 

Trump: I haven't heard about it, no. The attack that I watched were the fighters. And MbZ saw it, too, by the way. He was sitting back home in his beautiful palace, and he was watching it. And they were as good a fight as I've ever seen. 

UAE's MbZ: They were the best fights.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 08:49]
🇺🇸🇦🇪⚡️ — Trump on an Emirati journalist: What a nice-looking person. Is he from your country? 

UAE's MbZ: Absolutely. 

Trump: He's got such a nice way about him. My people, they're so mean. 

UAE's MbZ jokes with the journalist: Be careful now. 

Trump: I can put him in a movie right now.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 08:50]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — President Trump on Iran's nuclear dust:
We are in no rush, but we will get it, and we will destroy it.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 08:52]
🇺🇸🇷🇺⚡️ — President Trump says he might soon reimpose sanctions on Russian oil.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 09:11]
🇮🇱🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — NEW: Israel requested to see the memorandum of understanding between the U.S. and Iran but was rejected, according to Israeli Channel 12.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 09:21]
🇱🇧🇱🇧🇮🇷🇮🇱🇺🇸⚡️ — A senior Hezbollah source told Al-Araby TV that Iran had assured the group it would not sign the memorandum of understanding unless it included an Israeli withdrawal from Lebanon. 

➡️ The source said Tehran considers the withdrawal a necessary condition for finalizing the agreement.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 09:26]
🇺🇸🇦🇺⚡️ — The U.S. military plans to establish a permanent, war-ready weapons stockpile for the Marine Corps on Australia’s southeast coast, beyond the range of most Chinese missiles, according to tender documents and officials speaking to AFP.

➡️ Around $30 million will be invested in building storage facilities in rural Victoria to house U.S. military weapons, with the aim of improving the responsiveness of American forces across the Indo-Pacific region.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 09:33]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — President Trump says he may hold a press conference to read the U.S.-Iran memorandum of understanding aloud "so the press covers it accurately."

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 09:43]
🇺🇦🇷🇺🇺🇸⚡️ — Ukrainian President Zelensky:
Putin didn't use this opportunity to meet during G7. Putin made a lot of propositions again through different leaders to come to Moscow, but I mean, these are such games; we don't play such games. 

So we need some third country; it's not Russia, and it's not Ukraine. It can be Switzerland, it can be Türkiye, it can be Middle Eastern countries. It's up to President Trump. It could also be in America.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 09:44]
🇺🇦🇷🇺⚡️ — Ukrainian President Zelensky:
We will produce about 10 million drones during this year, but we can double that.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 09:47]
🇺🇦🇷🇺⚡️ — Ukrainian President Zelensky:
Can you imagine 35,000 Russian losses each month, heavy wounded or killed? 

Somebody has to stop Putin.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 09:48]
🇺🇦🇷🇺⚡️ — Ukrainian President Zelensky:
More than 60% of Russian society wants to stop this war.

That's why we need more pressure on Putin.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 09:49]
#NEW
⚡️🇮🇱🇺🇸❌🇮🇷 - The IAF's Chief Omer Tischler has issued a letter to troops, announcing that a "large" strike package targeting "the heart of Iran" was called off on the 8th of June.

According to the letter, the assault would have included "the entire air force" and hundreds of strikes missions in Iran. The operation was halted only 1 hour before the departure of the first sorties, by orders of Benjamin Netanyahu, directed from US president Donald Trump.

@GeoPWatch

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 09:53]
🇺🇦⚡️ — Q: Do you miss being an actor?

Zelensky: I miss being a good father.

Q: When your children were little, what did you tell them the most?

Zelensky: I love you.

Q: And what do you tell them now that they're older?

Zelensky: I miss you.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 09:54]
🇺🇦🇷🇺⚡️ — Q: When was the last time you cried?

Zelensky: I will try to do it after our interview… It's always difficult for me when I give orders, and mothers and fathers lose their children. 

In such moments, I often cry.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 09:54]
🇺🇦🇨🇳⚡️ — Q: Would you be open to having a conversation with Xi Jinping?

Zelensky: Of course. I am open to meet with President Xi, and our teams can work on it.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 09:57]
🇺🇸🇮🇷🇨🇭⚡️ — NEW: The US-Iran agreement is set to be signed on Friday at Bürgenstock Resort Lake Lucerne in Switzerland.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 10:02]
🇫🇷⚡️ — WATCH: G7 Summit Family Photo in Évian-les-Bains, France.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 10:03]
🇮🇱❌🇱🇧 — NOW: An Israeli drone strike targeted the southern Lebanese town of Mayfadoun.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 10:04]
🇬🇧⚡️ — Wes Streeting told POLITICO that he has secured enough support from Labour MPs to enter a potential leadership contest to replace Keir Starmer.

Streeting is advocating for a “genuine contest” rather than allowing Andy Burnham to succeed unchallenged. 

However, he is not expected to launch a challenge himself and instead believes Starmer should set out a timetable for his departure after Thursday’s by-election.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 10:07]
🇪🇺🇭🇺🇰🇼⚡️ — Eurosam is in talks with Kuwait and Hungary over potential SAMP/T NG air defense packages, while around 15 countries, including Switzerland and Estonia, are evaluating the system, according to Bloomberg.

➡️ The Franco-Italian SAMP/T NG is gaining interest as a European alternative to the U.S. Patriot system, which faces supply shortages and growing global demand. Eurosam says the system is NATO-compatible and the only European-made air defense system with anti-ballistic missile capabilities.

➡️ Production of the Aster missiles used by SAMP/T NG is expected to double to around 180 missiles this year and exceed 300 annually by 2027. The system has already entered service with Italy and France, while Denmark selected it for export delivery starting in 2028.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 10:09]
🇶🇦⚡️ — Qatar is preparing to rapidly increase its LNG production once the Strait of Hormuz reopens, with plans to restore most of its export capacity within two months, according to Bloomberg.

➡️ QatarEnergy has informed buyers that it expects output to reach around 50% of capacity one month after safe navigation resumes through the strait, rising to approximately 80% within two months.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 10:12]
🇩🇪🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — German Foreign Minister Johann Wadephul says Germany is ready to support mine-clearing operations in the Strait of Hormuz to help restore commercial shipping, but any deployment would depend on strict conditions.

➡️ Wadephul said the mission must be peaceful and non-combat in nature and carried out with the agreement of all parties, including both the U.S. and Iran. 

➡️ Germany would also need approval from the Bundestag before deploying its naval minesweeper, the Fulda, which is currently stationed in the Mediterranean Sea.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 10:39]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — Vice President JD Vance:
If the Iranian people want greater prosperity, then their leadership has to step up and change their behavior. 

If they do, great. If they don't, the United States has already gotten a lot.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 10:53]
🇮🇱❌🇱🇧 — Destruction in Yater, southern Lebanon, as a result of IDF operations.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 10:57]
🇨🇳🇮🇷🇺🇸⚡️ — Chinese Foreign Minister Wang Yi says the next phase of US-Iran negotiations will be “more difficult” than the first, AFP reports.

➡️ Foreign Minister Wang Yi told Pakistan’s Ishaq Dar the current consensus is “far from the final destination — it is a new starting point.”

➡️ Wang called for the UN Security Council to play a greater role in supporting the negotiations.

➡️ China says it is prepared to cooperate with Pakistan in advancing peace initiatives in the Middle East and Gulf region.​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 10:57]
🇮🇱❌🇱🇧 — Israel launched three consecutive drone strikes on the southern Lebanese town of Mayfadoun, according to Lebanon’s National News Agency.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 11:04]
🇷🇺🇺🇸🇺🇦⚡️ — Kremlin aide Yuri Ushakov:
Putin and Trump did not discuss the possibility of organizing a meeting with Zelensky in the U.S.

Tabz - Alternative Media, [16.06.2026 11:05]
🇷🇺🇺🇸🇺🇦⚡️ — Kremlin aide Yuri Ushakov:
The Kremlin expects that Witkoff and Kushner will be able to come to Moscow for negotiations on Ukraine after the signing of a memorandum between the U.S. and Iran.

Watcher Guru, [15.06.2026 07:58]
JUST IN: Michael Saylor's 'Strategy' buys 1,587 Bitcoin worth $105 million.

@WatcherGuru

Watcher Guru, [15.06.2026 11:49]
JUST IN: $67,000 Bitcoin

@WatcherGuru

Watcher Guru, [15.06.2026 13:14]
JUST IN: Elon Musk's SpaceX $SPCX rises another 14% today, surpassing $2.4 trillion market cap.

@WatcherGuru

Watcher Guru, [15.06.2026 16:13]
JUST IN: BlackRock to launch Bitcoin Premium Income ETF tomorrow.

@WatcherGuru

Watcher Guru, [15.06.2026 16:27]
JUST IN: 🇺🇸 $1.1 trillion added to the US stock market today.

@WatcherGuru

Watcher Guru, [15.06.2026 18:49]
If you had bought SpaceX's $SPCX IPO last Friday, you would have out performed everyone holding ETH for the past 5 years.

@WatcherGuru

Watcher Guru, [16.06.2026 07:24]
JUST IN: Elon Musk's SpaceX $SPCX to acquire AI coding startup Cursor for $60,000,000,000.

@WatcherGuru

Watcher Guru, [16.06.2026 08:55]
JUST IN: 🇦🇪 Dubai's DMCC signs strategic deal with $USDT issuer Tether to expand blockchain, digital assets, and tokenized finance.

@WatcherGuru

Watcher Guru, [16.06.2026 10:06]
JUST IN: SpaceX $SPCX surpasses Microsoft $MSFT to become the fourth most valuable company by market cap.

@WatcherGuru

Watcher Guru, [16.06.2026 10:20]
JUST IN: $14 trillion BlackRock officially launches Bitcoin Premium Income ETF.

@WatcherGuru

Watcher Guru, [16.06.2026 11:08]
JUST IN: Coinbase to launch tokenized stock trading.

@WatcherGuru

🇺🇸🐊⚡️- A prediction market posted on X claiming Byron Donalds has the highest percentage of winning the Republican primary in Florida yet. 

The prediction market was revealed to have donated $25,000 to the Donalds' campaign by the Miami Herald. The prediction market has also made over 10 posts concerning the primary, with the vast majority diminishing Donalds’ opponent’s chances while boosting pro-Donalds posts. 

In addition, Donalds’ has reposted the most recent post by his supportive prediction market.

Middle East Spectator — MES, [15.06.2026 08:39]
— 🇮🇷/🇮🇷 Full statement by Hezbollah on the MoU (1/2):

‘Hezbollah congratulates the Islamic Republic of Iran, its leadership, and its people, on the great achievement of reaching a Memorandum of Understanding with the United States of America, which has led to a comprehensive ceasefire on all fronts, including Lebanon. 

This great achievement is the fruit of the legendary steadfastness, exceptional resilience, and immense sacrifices made by the dear Iranian people and their wise leadership, who have adhered to the national choices that preserved their dignity, sovereignty, and independence.

On this momentous occasion, Hezbollah extends its greetings and appreciation to His Eminence the Supreme Leader of the Islamic Revolution, Imam Sayyed Mojtaba Khamenei (may God protect him), who has guided this phase with unparalleled wisdom, courage, and insight, to the President and government of Iran, and to the valiant armed forces of the Islamic Revolutionary Guard Corps, the Army, and the brotherly Iranian people. 

Hezbollah expresses its profound gratitude for their unwavering support to Lebanon, its people, and its resistance, and for their insistence that Lebanon be present in any agreement leading to a cessation of hostilities and the preservation of its rights. For this, they have borne the heavy burdens of siege and aggression, thus reaffirming that the Islamic Republic is truly a strong and loyal ally and supporter.

Hezbollah also extends its greetings to all the countries that participated, contributed, assisted, and supported the efforts to remove obstacles in order to achieve this agreement. Hezbollah emphasizes that Lebanon must make the best use of this regional and international support to achieve Lebanese sovereignty and liberate its lands within the framework of national unity.

We extend our deepest respect and admiration to the honorable, dignified, and resilient people of the resistance, and to the displaced families, for their patience, endurance, and steadfastness. We salute their sacrifices and all they have offered in the face of this barbaric aggression. They have truly proven themselves to be a proud people, the most honorable of all, as described by the Master of the Martyrs of the Nation, His Eminence Sayyed Hassan Nasrallah.

We also salute the leadership of the resistance and its valiant, heroic fighters, the nation's impregnable shield and strong bulwark, who sacrificed their pure blood and souls for the glory of their homeland and the dignity of their people. They waged heroic battles where the Israeli enemy witnessed some of their might and tasted the bitterness of defeat.

We affirm that what has been achieved is a prelude to completing the liberation of our land, the return of our prisoners to their homeland and families, the return of all residents, especially those in the frontline villages, to their homes, and the reconstruction of what the aggression has destroyed. We call upon our steadfast people to exercise patience and await instructions from the relevant authorities regarding their safe return to their villages and towns, for their own safety and to avoid any dangers that may arise from potential Israeli violations.

The Israeli enemy must understand that there will be no return to the pre-March 2ns status quo, and that the resistance, which has been and remains the vigilant guardian of the homeland and its people, will not accept any aggression that violates its sovereignty or sheds the blood of its people. The resistance will remain committed to Lebanon's legitimate and unwavering right to defend its land, its people, and its sovereignty until a complete withdrawal is achieved and the prisoners are returned.’

@Middle_East_Spectator

Middle East Spectator — MES, [15.06.2026 08:39]
— 🇮🇷/🇮🇷 Full Hezbollah statement on the MoU (2/2):

‘Therefore, we emphasize that this stage requires the government and all Lebanese political forces to return to a unified national stance in order to achieve the goals upon which the Lebanese people agree, goals that embody Lebanon's best interests and preserve its sovereignty, strength, and resilience in the face of Israeli ambitions.

It is wise to review all the calculations and paths taken by the authorities, to benefit from this experience and the experiences that preceded it in our homeland Lebanon, to move away from illusions and losing bets, and to acknowledge that a unified Lebanese position and reliance on true friends is the best way to preserve national interests.’

@Middle_East_Spectator

Middle East Spectator — MES, [15.06.2026 08:45]
—❗️🇺🇸/🇮🇷 Iran’s Foreign Ministry Spokesman, Ismael Baqaei:

– According to the MoU, Iran will be responsible for managing passage through the Strait of Hormuz, in coordination with Oman.

– Iran is not seeking to impose tolls. However, in return for navigation services, environmental protection, insurances and other maritime services, Iran will collect the necessary fees.

@Middle_East_Spectator

Middle East Spectator — MES, [15.06.2026 08:49]
— 🇺🇸/🇮🇷/🇮🇱/🇱🇧 Response by Iran’s Foreign Ministry to Israel’s claim they will not withdraw from Lebanon:

– We know that Israel never takes any action without consultation and direct coordination with America.

– Therefore, we hold America directly responsible if it fails to force Israel to submit to its obligations as part of the MoU, with necessary consequences.

@Middle_East_Spectator

Middle East Spectator — MES, [15.06.2026 09:05]
— 🇺🇸/🇮🇷 NOTE: The concept of ‘maritime services’ fees in the Strait of Hormuz would function similarly to Turkey’s fees in the Bosphorus Strait 

Turkey charges vessels transiting the Bosphorus by ‘net tonnage’ (NT), approximately $5.83 per NT. 

In the Bosphorus, that equates to about ~$220 million in annual revenue for Turkey. But the average tonnage of ships crossing the Bosphorus Strait is much smaller than those crossing the Strait of Hormuz, and the amount of crossings is also much lower.

Let’s assume that Iran would impose approximately the same amount of maritime fees in the Strait of Hormuz, but adjusted for traffic and tonnage.

With an average tonnage per ship of 80,000-100,000 NT in the Strait of Hormuz, and average crossing of between 35,000 and 40,000 vessels per year:

Iran would make approximately $16-$20 Billion dollars annually just from maritime fees, even without tolls. If Iran becomes the primary insurance provider, that would be billions more.

@Middle_East_Spectator

Middle East Spectator — MES, [15.06.2026 09:10]
— 🇺🇸/🇮🇷/🇱🇧 NEW: Without thanking Iran, Lebanese Prime Minister Nawaf Salam accepts the ceasefire agreement in Lebanon as part of the Iran-U.S. Memorandum of Understanding and says the Lebanese government will work to ensure that Israel abides by withdrawing from Lebanese territory

@Middle_East_Spectator

Middle East Spectator — MES, [15.06.2026 09:12]
— For the Strait of Hormuz, there is one issue.

How will Iran enforce its control if the credible threat of military force is gone?

Vessels can just take the Omani route and not coordinate with Iran at all.

Let’s see how Iran solves this.

Middle East Spectator — MES, [15.06.2026 10:13]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — Vice President JD Vance on Iran:
We are seeing both Iranian hardliners and political leaders saying, “Our relationship with the U.S. over the past 47 years has been a mistake. Let's turn over a new leaf.”

Middle East Spectator — MES, [15.06.2026 10:17]
J.D. Vance acting like Iran signed the Abraham Accords or something lol

The only thing that happened is ‘we promise not to bomb the shit out of you, and you promise not to bomb the shit out of us, do we have a deal?’

Middle East Spectator — MES, [15.06.2026 10:18]
🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — CBS: The Iranians are saying they're gonna have access to a $300 billion reconstruction fund. True or false?

JD Vance: That's the sort of things they could have access to, so long as they honor their end of the obligation.

Middle East Spectator — MES, [15.06.2026 11:53]
— 🇺🇸/🇮🇷 NEW: Iran and the U.S. have both already signed the MoU electronically, with J.D. Vance signing for the Americans and Qalibaf signing for the Iranian side

However, a ‘formal signing ceremony’ will still take place on Friday in Geneva, according to a senior U.S. official – CNN

@Middle_East_Spectator

Middle East Spectator — MES, [15.06.2026 11:54]
— If the MoU is already signed electronically, why should there be another signing ceremony on Friday? 

Why give a photo-op to Trump / Vance so they can present an image of victory? I don’t understand this.

It almost makes me think that the U.S. specifically insisted on an in-person signing as part of the MoU conditions. PR is very important to them.

@Middle_East_Spectator

Middle East Spectator — MES, [15.06.2026 12:01]
—❗️🇮🇱/🇮🇷 NEW: Hezbollah launched a barrage of rockets and an ATGM at a column of Israeli tanks that tried to advance to Kfar Tebnit in violation of the ceasefire

@Middle_East_Spectator

Middle East Spectator — MES, [15.06.2026 13:25]
— 🇮🇱/🇱🇧/🇮🇷 NEW: A U.S. official also told Reuters that withdrawal from Lebanon is not part of the MoU, confirming the statement by Israel

If it isn’t, then why did Iranian officials say it is? And what was that alleged ‘last minute concession’ given to prevent an attack on Israel?

@Middle_East_Spectator

Middle East Spectator — MES, [15.06.2026 13:36]
For me, nothing in this deal is more important than Lebanon. 

I don’t care about the money or sanctions relief or even Hormuz if there’s no peace in Lebanon.

Middle East Spectator — MES, [15.06.2026 13:41]
What could be is that Iran and the U.S. did agree on an Israeli withdrawal from Lebanon, but that Israel is allowed to present it as a separate agremeent with the Lebanese government, having Aoun announce it in a week or two, so that Iran doesn’t get any credit.

Middle East Spectator — MES, [15.06.2026 13:54]
— 🇺🇸/🇮🇷 Reporter: ‘Will Iran be allow to produce ballistic missiles with no limitation?’

President Trump: ‘It’s a great deal. They will never have a nuclear weapon.’

Reporter: ‘What about missiles?’

President Trump: ‘You’re with the fake news. You’re fake. You’re a horrible person.’

@Middle_East_Spectator

Middle East Spectator — MES, [15.06.2026 14:03]
—❗️🇮🇱/🇮🇷 Hezbollah in its first military statement since the ceasefire:

‘In defense of Lebanon, and based on the legitimate right to resist occupation and liberate the land, and in response to the Israeli enemy's violation of the ceasefire:

After monitoring an Israeli force consisting of a bulldozer and two Merkava tanks advancing from Hamat Arnon, the checkpoint near the border in the outskirts of Kafr Tannin, fighters of the Islamic Resistance attacked them with ATGMs and Ababil-1000 guided drones, forcing them to retreat.

@Middle_East_Spectator

Middle East Spectator — MES, [15.06.2026 14:09]
Netanyahu is giving a speech, so far he is detailing all of Israel’s ‘achievements’ (from Nasrallah’s killing to invading Syria etc.), probably preparing to announce an end to the war.

Middle East Spectator — MES, [15.06.2026 14:12]
—❗️🇮🇱/🇱🇧 BREAKING: ‘We will remain in the occupied areas in Lebanon. We will maintain the security zone.’ – Netanyahu

@Middle_East_Spectator

Middle East Spectator — MES, [15.06.2026 14:15]
—❗️🇮🇱/🇱🇧 Netanyahu: 

‘What we did in Gaza, we will do in Lebanon.

Just like we secured the South of Israel, we will secure the North.’

@Middle_East_Spectator

Middle East Spectator — MES, [15.06.2026 14:17]
—❗️🇮🇱/🇺🇸/🇮🇷/🇱🇧 Netanyahu: ‘Sometimes, I do not agree with Trump. Therefore, Israel will do whatever it takes to maintain its own security.’

@Middle_East_Spectator

Middle East Spectator — MES, [15.06.2026 14:22]
— 🇮🇱/🇺🇸/🇮🇷 Netanyahu: ‘We don’t know exactly what’s in the agreement between Iran and the U.S.’

@Middle_East_Spectator

Middle East Spectator — MES, [15.06.2026 14:22]
Netanyahu is taking questions now.

Middle East Spectator — MES, [15.06.2026 14:23]
— 🇮🇱/🇮🇷 Reporter: ‘Was the war against Iran a mistake?’

Netanyahu: ‘I never said that one of the operation's goals was to topple the Iranian regime. I said the goal is to prepare the conditions for the Iranian people to overthrow it.’

@Middle_East_Spectator

Middle East Spectator — MES, [15.06.2026 14:25]
— 🇺🇸/🇮🇱/🇮🇷 Reporter: ‘Are you the one who makes decisions about Israel, or is it Trump and America?

Netanyahu: ‘I set certain parameters for our activity and we are doing it, but we cannot completely ignore what the U.S. says’

@Middle_East_Spectator

Middle East Spectator — MES, [15.06.2026 14:27]
—❗️🇮🇱/🇺🇸/🇮🇷/🇱🇧 Netanyahu, in response to a question:

‘Iran wanted us to withdraw from southern Lebanon, but I was extremely, extremely, extremely firm in my refusal—and we will not do it’

@Middle_East_Spectator

Middle East Spectator — MES, [15.06.2026 14:28]
End of speech / comments.

Middle East Spectator — MES, [15.06.2026 14:47]
— 🇱🇧/🇮🇷 Lebanese Minister of Industry: *Gives candy*

Reporter: ‘What’s the occasion?’

Minister: ‘The ceasefire’

Reporter: ‘What are the next steps after the ceasefire?’

Minister: ‘Ask the Iranian embassy’

@Middle_East_Spectator

Middle East Spectator — MES, [15.06.2026 16:31]
🇮🇷🤝🇶🇦- According to Israel Hayom, diplomatic officials have confirmed that Washington secretly authorized Qatar to transfer funds to Tehran in exchange for freedom of navigation through the Strait of Hormuz and immunity from Iranian attacks. 

➡️ The arrangement was deliberately intended to ease global energy prices, with the US Navy effectively turning a blind eye to the deal in contradiction of its declared policy.

➡️ The secret approval, granted approximately one month ago, served as the groundwork for the memorandum of understanding now being forged with Iran. 

➡️ Qatar, fearing renewed Iranian attacks on its facilities following a strike on one of its gas installations during the war, sought to secure quiet through the financial arrangement. Some payments were disguised as tanker passage fees, with a credit line of up to $1 billion also opened for goods purchases through Qatar.

@GeoPWatch

Middle East Spectator — MES, [15.06.2026 16:40]
—❗️🇮🇷 BREAKING: Iran has fired warning shots at a vessel in the Strait of Hormuz

@Middle_East_Spectator

Middle East Spectator — MES, [15.06.2026 16:46]
🇮🇷🇺🇸⚡️ — The U.S. naval blockade has effectively ended, with multiple Iranian vessels passing through the blockade zone without incident, according to Fars News Agency.

➡️ An Iranian VLCC oil tanker sailed from international waters towards Iranian ports after crossing the blockade area. A vessel carrying livestock feed also passed through the zone en route to Iran.

➡️ Additionally, a fully loaded Iranian oil tanker crossed the Sea of Oman and the former blockade line, continuing towards its export destination.

Middle East Spectator — MES, [15.06.2026 16:46]
While Iran’s management of the Strait of Hormuz continues, the American blockade has been lifted and Iranian ships are passing now.

Middle East Spectator — MES, [15.06.2026 17:10]
— 🇮🇷 NEW: Brigadier General Ismael Qaani, Commander of the IRGC Quds Force and successor of Qasem Soleimani, appeared on Iranian TV for the first time in almost a year

@Middle_East_Spectator

Middle East Spectator — MES, [15.06.2026 18:11]
🇺🇸⚡️ — NEW: Eight crewmembers are believed to be dead in the B-52 bomber crash at Edwards Air Force Base, according to CNN.

Middle East Spectator — MES, [15.06.2026 19:30]
— 🇺🇸/🇮🇷 President Trump on Truth Social:

‘Iran has agreed to never have a Nuclear Weapon! Also, the story that the U.S. is paying Iran 300 million Dollars is Fake News, put out by the Dumocrats!!!’

@Middle_East_Spectator

Middle East Spectator — MES, [15.06.2026 19:33]
You’re right Mr. President—it’s not $300 million.

It’s $300 Billion.

Middle East Spectator — MES, [15.06.2026 19:35]
— 🇺🇸/🇮🇷 NEW: CIA Director John Ratcliffe told President Trump and other senior officials that U.S. intelligence indicates Iran does not intend to abide by its nuclear commitments in case of a final deal – Axios

@Middle_East_Spectator

Middle East Spectator — MES, [15.06.2026 19:38]
— 🇺🇸/🇮🇷 NEW: ‘U.S. intelligence showed that Iranian officials talked very differently among themselves than with U.S. officials, raising serious concerns about whether Iran is willing to make any real concessions on its nuclear program’ – Axios

@Middle_East_Spectator

Middle East Spectator — MES, [15.06.2026 20:25]
— 🇺🇸/🇮🇱 Israelis on Telegram in response to the B-52 crash and death of 8 Americans: 

‘They deserve it, I hate the United States no less than Iran.’

‘We just started, dear Americans. The blows have only just begun.’

@Middle_East_Spectator

Middle East Spectator — MES, [15.06.2026 23:21]
🇮🇷 Iran 2 — New Zealand 2 🇳🇿

The first match of Iran at the FIFA World Cup 2026 ended in a draw.

@Middle_East_Spectator

Middle East Spectator — MES, [15.06.2026 23:27]
— Some monarchist diaspora held the Israeli flag in the stadium, but real Iranians held the Palestinian flag

@Middle_East_Spectator

Middle East Spectator — MES, [16.06.2026 08:38]
— 🇮🇷/🇺🇸/🇮🇱/🇱🇧 Iran’s Foreign Minister, Abbas Araqchi:

‘From our perspective, there are two sides in this MoU. On one side there is the United States and Israel, and on the other side there is Iran and Hezbollah.

An end to the war in Lebanon is an inseperable part of the complete end of the war in the region. And a complete end to the war includes a withdrawal of all the forces from occupied areas. 

Without the withdrawal of Israeli forces from the lands it occupied during this war, it won’t be considered a complete end to the war. 

Any military attack by Israel against Lebanon from now on, or the continuation of Israeli occupation inside Lebanon, will definitely be considered a violation of the MoU.’

@Middle_East_Soectator

Middle East Spectator — MES, [16.06.2026 09:22]
🇮🇱🇺🇸🇮🇷⚡️ — NEW: Israel requested to see the memorandum of understanding between the U.S. and Iran but was rejected, according to Israeli Channel 12.

Middle East Spectator — MES, [16.06.2026 11:11]
—❗️🇮🇱/🇱🇧 NEW: Israel violated the ceasefire in Lebanon, carrying out a double-tap strike in Mayfadoun

A vehicle was struck, and the subsequent arrival of medical crews and civilians was then bombed three times. There are martyrs at the scene.

@Middle_East_Spectator
